 In the meantime, we have mice that are 4 months old and don't have diabetes, but that have had it earlier.
 Professor Ehud Ur in the Department of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, who is also the chair of the clinical and scientific division of the Canadian Diabetes Association,
 Like some other experts, he is sceptical about the question of whether his diabetes can be cured, noting that these findings have no value for people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Nobel Prize in literature at the Swedish Academy, announced on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that the Academy had been unable to contact Bob Dylan to tell him that he had won the 2016 Nobel Prize in literature.
 Danius declared, we are doing nothing at the moment. I have spoken to his closest aide and have received friendly replies.
 Earlier, Jamie Siminoff, the Ceo of Ring, noted that the company was founded when his doorbell from the store couldn't be heard in his garage.
 He said he made a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said that sales increased after he appeared on Shark Tank in 2013, where the show's panel of investors did not want to fund the start-up.
 At the end of 2017, Siminoff was featured on the shopping channel, QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with the ADT Corporation, a competing security company.
 One experimental vaccine appears to be able to reduce Ebola deaths, but so far no drugs have been clearly shown to be effective in treating existing infections.
 A cocktail of antibodies, ZMapp, was initially promising in the field, but official studies showed it had less benefit than was hoped.
 ZMapp was a control in the PALM trial, so scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatment methods to it.
 The U S . Olympic Committee has the support of USA Gymnastics and understands that it is necessary for the Olympic family to promote a safe and healthy environment for all of our athletes.
 We join the USOC in stating that it is best for our athletes, clubs, and their sport to make meaningful changes to our organization instead of taking away certifications.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent review that can shed more light on how abuse of this scale, so bravely described by the victims of Larry Nassar, could go unnoticed for so long, and embraces all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the USOC have the same goal: to ensure that athletes can pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and empowering environment by making gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible.
 During the sixty s, Brzezinski worked as an advisor to John F . Kennedy and then to the administration of Lyndon B . Johnson.
 He advised Carter during the 1976 campaign on foreign policy, and then succeeded Henry Kissinger as National Security Advisor.
 As a senior NSA official, he assisted Carter in the diplomatic handling of worldwide issues, such as the Camp David Accords in 1978, the stabilization of the U S. China relationship in the late 1970s, and the Iranian Revolution, the subsequent hostage crisis, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone was nominated for all of the major categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for best actor and best actress.
 Among the other nominations were best film, director, cinematography, costume design, film editing, original music, production design, costume design, original music, production design, and original screenplay.
 The songs Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars from the film were nominated for Best Original Song, and Lionsgate hauled in 26 nominations, a record for a studio.
 In a statement from his press Secretary, the American President, Donald Trump, said Sunday night that the American troops would withdraw from Syria.
 The announcement came after a telephone call between Trump and the Turkish President, Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 The Turks also gave assurances that they would guard the captured ISIS fighters, whom Europe refused to take back.
 This proves not only the widely-held theory that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, but also offers more details than fossils, such as the color and three-dimensional placement.
 According to scientists, the feathers of this bird were chestnut-brown with a pale or carotenoid-colored underside.
 The find also gives insight into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 The researchers concluded that the rachis was probably a later evolutionary development, because dinosaur feathers do not have a well-developed shaft, or rachis,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but to regulate temperature or to look the part.
 Despite the fact that it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the researchers suggested that it might have been the feathered tail of an adult dinosaur.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded at the main headquarters of the police in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and injuring more than twenty other people.
 Among the injured are nineteen police officers, said the governor.
 The police suspect a Daesh militant of the attack.
 It has been noted that the sun follows the same basic principles as other stars,
 The brightness and rotation are used to determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma rotation.
 The smaller the number of Rossby waves, the less active the star is in terms of magnetic reversals.
 Iwasaki ran into trouble at several points during his journey.
 Pirates robbed him, a rabid dog attacked him in Tibet, he escaped a marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard is compatible with both frequencies, 2.4 GHz and 5 GHz.
 If the base station has dual radios, this allows backwards compatibility with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g.
 Speeds of 802.11n are substantially faster than those of the predecessors with a maximum theoretical capacity of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duvall is married with two children and made no great impression on Miller, to whom the story was related.
 On a request for comment, Millar responded, quote, Mike talks a lot during the hearing.
 We are doing our utmost to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP in 2020 by a significant margin compared with the level in 2005.
 He has not set any figures for the cuts, saying that they will be determined on the basis of China's economic output.
 Hu urged developing countries to avoid the old way of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 He added that they should not be asked to take on obligations that are beyond their development, level, responsibility and capabilities.
 The Iraqi study group presented its report today at 12.00 GMT.
 The warning is that no one can guarantee that any one trade in Iraq will end sectarian warfare, increasing violence or the tendency towards chaos.
 In the beginning of the report, there is a call for an open discussion and for consensus-building in the USA on the Middle East policy.
 The report strongly criticises almost every aspect of the current administration of IRAQ and urges a radical change of course.
 The report contains 78 recommendations, the first of which is that diplomatic action should be taken this year to protect Iraq's borders from hostile powers and to restore diplomatic relations with neighbouring countries.
 Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, a senator and the wife of the Argentine President, announced last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers away from Buenos Aires, that she intends to run for President.
 Kirchner announced her intention to run for the Presidency at the Argentine theatre, where she started her campaign for the Senate in 2005 as a member of the Buenos Aires provincial legislature.
 The debate was sparked by a discussion about investing and rebuilding after Hurricane Katrina, and some fiscal conservatives jokingly referred to it as the New Orleans deal.
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction work is directed at the awarding of reconstruction contracts to alleged insiders from Washington.
 The funeral was attended by more than four million people in Rome.
 There were so many people present that not everyone could get into the funeral on St . Peter's square.
 There were large television screens set up in various places around Rome so that people could watch the ceremony.
 Similar setups were made in many other Italian cities and in the rest of the world, and then especially in Poland.
 Historians have criticized earlier FBI policies, saying that they focused on easy-to-solve cases,
 As of the fiscal year 2005, the Congress funded the initiative against obscenity and directed the FBI to deploy ten agents on adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score of the innings with 70 runs from just 41 balls, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 In the middle order, however, batting well, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid scored a century.
 But after India lost the wicket of the captain, they scored only 36 runs while losing 7 wickets.
 And the President of the United States, George W . Bush, arrived in Singapore on the morning of November sixteenth for a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was received by Wong Kan Seng, the vice-president of Singapore, and discussed trade and terrorism issues with the Prime Minister of Singapore, Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush spoke this week in a public address about increasing trade relations with Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper has agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee for all parties to review, prior to the second reading, after the 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton at PMO on Tuesday.
 During the meeting with the Premier, Layton asked for changes to the Conservatives' environmental law, asking for it to be, quote,
 Since the Federal Government took over funding of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the Federal Government and some Federal parliamentarians have criticised this law as a stunt during the beginning period of the Federal election, which is held in November.
 However, Prime Minister John Howard has stated that the law is only intended to prevent the Tasmanian government from cutting back on the hospital's facilities,
 According to the latest bulletin, the sea level indicated a tsunami,
 There is no major damage or serious injury reported, although power was out for some time, and the Tongan authorities were unable to receive the PTWC tsunami warning.
 The warnings were withdrawn, but fourteen schools in Hawaii were closed Wednesday,
 George W . Bush, the leader of the United States, welcomed the announcement.
 A spokesman for Bush, Gordon Johndroe, described the North Korean promise as a big step forward in our goal to denuclearize the Korean peninsula.
 The tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, Subtropical Storm Jerry, formed today over the Atlantic Ocean.
 According to the National Hurricane Center, Jerry is currently not a threat to the mainland.
 According to the U S . Army Corps of engineers, 6 inches of rain could potentially cause the earlier damaged levees to break.
 In the Ninth Ward, during Hurricane Katrina, the water rose to over 20 feet, and still stands at the middle of the nearby levee,
 The water flows over a 100-foot wide section of the dike.
 The Commons-Beheerder Adam Cuerden expressed his frustrations over the deletion during his interview with Wikinews.
 He lied in principle to us from the beginning. Firstly, by pretending it was about legal reasons. Secondly, by just pretending to listen to us, until he removed the art.
 The frustrations within the community resulted in the current attempts to formulate a policy with regard to the sexual content of the site that hosts millions of pieces of media content with an open licence.
 The completed work was primarily theoretical in nature, but the program is written to simulate observations of the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The team was looking for the effect that would be caused by the tidal forces between the dark matter of the universe and that of the Milky way.
 Comparable to how the moon exerts its gravitational pull on the earth, which leads to tides, the Milky way exerts its gravitational pull on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The researchers concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as it affects ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, the majority of the dark matter in a Galaxy is found in a kind of halo,
 On television footage, you can see white smoke coming from the plant.
 Local authorities are giving the following warning to residents who live near the factory,
 The Japanese nuclear energy agency reports that radioactive cesium and iodine have been detected at the plant.
 Authorities suspect that this indicates containers of uranium fuel may have been damaged and are leaking.
 XDR-TB was discovered by Dr Tony Moll in the KwaZulu-Natal province of South Africa.
 In an interview, he stated that the new variant is, quote, very, very worrying and concerning because of the very high death rate.
 Dr Moll thinks some of the patients may have caught the disease in the hospital, including two nurses from the hospital.
 An infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts in a year.
 The percentage of XDR-TB among all tuberculosis patients, however, seems to be still at the low end,
 The satellites, which both weighed more than 1,000 pounds and were traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, collided 491 miles above the earth.
 Scientists say that the collision caused a huge explosion.
 They are still trying to figure out how big the impact was and how it will affect the earth.
 The United States Strategic Command of the United States Department of Defense is tracing the debris.
 On a public Website, the result of the plot analysis is posted.
 According to official records in Ohio, a doctor from the children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is being charged with aggravated murder after the body of her mother was found Wednesday in the trunk of her car.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in his T-shirt, underwear and heavily medicated state along a highway in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb about 15 miles north of Cincinnati.
 She sent officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 At this spot, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, age 53, which was covered with bloody sheets.
 The police stated that the body had been there for approximately a day.
 The first cases of the disease were reported this season at the end of July.
 Pigs carry the disease and transmit it to humans via mosquitoes.
 The Indian government has decided to deploy people who catch pigs in the worst-affected parts of the country,
 The government has promised several million encephalitis vaccines so that health authorities can prepare for next year.
 The plans to deliver vaccines this year to the places that have been hit hardest historically have been delayed because of a lack of funding and the low priority given to other diseases.
 Słania moved to Sweden in 1956, where he worked for three years as a chief engraver at the Swedish postal service.
 He produced more than 1000 stamps for Sweden and another 28 countries.
 His work is recognized for its quality and detail, and his name is a household word among stamp collectors.
 The beautiful stamp, Great Deeds by Swedish Kings', made by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl in 2000 and mentioned in the Guinness Book of Records, was his 1 000th stamp.
 He has also created the portraits of the Minister-President on the front of the new Canadian five and one hundred dollar bills.
 After the accident, Gibson was rushed to the hospital where he died shortly after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle itself was removed around 12.00 GMT from the scene of the accident.
 An employee of a garage near the accident said, there were children waiting to cross the road and they were all screaming and crying.
 They all ran back from the scene of the accident.
 Other topics on the agenda include the protection of remaining forests in the world, as well as sharing technologies to help developing countries grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN hopes to set up a fund to help countries that are suffering from the effects of global warming.
 Flood-resistant houses, more efficient water management and diversification of crops could be investments where the money could be used.
 Some people tried to stop women from speaking out about women's health, but these efforts failed.
 This based on the many positive comments and support from both men and women who found that contraception should be considered as a medical necessity.
 When the fighting stopped after the wounded had been transported to the hospital, about 40 of the other remaining inmates stayed on the inner courtyard and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators have been trying to get the situation back on track, but the demands of the inmates are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 23:00 local time, the inmates set fire to the courtyard.
 Agents in riot gear soon entered the garden and drove the prisoners into a corner with tear gas.
 The firefighters were able to give the all-clear at 11:35.
 The seasonal flooding that used to spread sediment throughout the river was ended by the construction of the dam in 1963.
 This sediment was needed for creating sandbars and beaches, which served as habitats for wildlife.
 Two species have become extinct and two others are threatened with extinction, including the Gila cypha.
 After the flood, the water level will only rise a few metres, but officials hope that this is enough to restore the eroded sandbanks downstream.
 There is no tsunami warning issued, and according to the geophysical bureau of Jakarta,
 There was no tsunami threat, but residents were still in a state of panic and left their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey, with tears in her eyes, said goodbye, she promised her fans that she would be back.
 I take no leave, this is the end of one chapter and the beginning of another.
 Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections were won by the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba, with a large margin.
 Currently, the SWAPO party, the South West African People's Organisation, is the ruling party, with a majority of seats in the National Assembly.
 The coalition and Afghan troops went into the area to secure the location and another coalition aircraft was sent to provide support.
 The helicopter crashed high in mountainous terrain and it is suspected that this was caused by enemy fire.
 Attempts to locate the site of the accident are hampered by the bad weather and the rough terrain.
 According to the medical charity, Mangola, Doctors without Borders, and the World Health Organisation, it is the worst recorded outbreak in the country.
 Richard Veerman, a spokesman for Doctors without Borders, said,
 It was a beautiful day when the tournament started at 10 a M.
 The tournament favourite, South Africa, started well with a comfortable 26-00 win against the 5th-placed Zambia.
 Although they played extremely stiff against their Southern cousins, South Africa managed to improve themselves in the tournament.
 They stood out for their tight defense, control of the ball and outstanding teamwork and were clearly the main opponent.
 Amsterdam officials and staff of the Anne Frank House state that the tree has a fungus and poses a danger to public health, because the tree, according to them, could fall.
 The tree was due to be felled on Tuesday, but a court order stopped this.
 The entrances to the cave were called the Seven Sisters and all have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images show that the temperature at night and during the day differs and show that it is likely caves.
 During the day they are cooler than the surrounding surface, and at night they are warmer.
 The thermal behavior of these deep holes is not as stable as that of large caves on earth, which often maintain a fairly constant temperature.
 In France, voting has long been a simple matter of going to a booth,
 Officials first check the identity of the voter, then the voter slides the envelope into the ballot box and then he or she puts his or her signature on the ballot roll.
 The process is relatively tightly regulated in the French electoral code.
 Voting booths have to be transparent since 1988, so that both voters and observers can see that no envelopes are added at the beginning of the vote and that no other envelopes are added than those of registered and authorised voters.
 The candidates may send representatives to witness each part of the process,
 The ASUS Eee PC, which was launched worldwide for cost-saving and diverse functionalities, was extensively discussed in the Taipei IT Month of 2007.
 The consumer market for laptop computers, however, is very diverse and has changed since ASUS won the Taiwan Sustainable Award in 2007 from the executive yuan of the Republic of China.
 The Website of the station describes the show as an old-school radio hoorser with a new and unheard of twist.
 In the beginning, the show was only broadcast via the long-running radio website TogiNet Radio, a website about talk radio.
 At the end of 2015, the AstroNet Radio understation was inaugurated.
 Originally, the series featured local amateur voice actors from the East Texas area.
 The widespread looting went on, allegedly, at night, because there were no law enforcement officials in the streets of Bishkek.
 Bishkek was described by one person as an anarchistic state, where gangs roamed the streets and shops were looted.
 In Bishkek, the blame for the unrest was placed by several people at demonstrators from the south.
 In the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in the South African town of Rustenburg, the same country had beaten the New Zealand All Blacks in a Rugby Union game.
 The final score was a one-point win, 21 to 20, ending the All Blacks' 15-game winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it was finally won, after five games in a row.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The last game of the series is next week in Ellis Park in Johannesburg, as the Springboks play in Australia.
 Monday at 10:08 a.m. a moderate earthquake struck Western Montana.
 There were no reports of damage at the United States Geological Survey and the National earthquake information center.
 The earthquake occurred about 20 kilometers north-northwest of Dillon, and about 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 Monday a dead wild duck was found in the marshes of Lyon in the East of France, which has been confirmed to be infected with the deadly H5N1 bird flu virus.
 After Italy, Greece, Bulgaria, Slovenia, Slovenia, Germany and Austria, France is the seventh country in the European Union where this virus is present.
 The suspected H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers blamed God for the widespread killing, destruction, and terrorizing of many millions of earth's inhabitants.
 Agnost Chambers says his lawsuit is frivolous and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The French opera is a story by Camille Saint-Saens and is about an artist whose life is controlled by the love of drugs and Japan.
 As a result, performers smoke cannabis on the stage, and the theater itself encourages the audience to partake.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas governor Rick Perry, and Congresswoman Michele Bachmann ended up in the fourth, fifth, and sixth places respectively.
 When the results were announced, Gingrich praised Santorum, but criticized Romney, whose negative campaign ads against Gingrich had been aired in Iowa.
 Perry returned to Texas to assess the results of the primary election that night, saying, I will be back in South Carolina on January 21 to continue the fight.
 The winner of the Ames Straw Poll in August, Bachmann, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was then transferred to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he died.
 According to sources, he was in his twenties, and said, quote, I was not present or directly involved in this unfortunate incident, but I'm keeping the victim's family in my thoughts.
 The entertainment news Website TMZ says the photographer had parked his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and was trying to take pictures of the traffic control before he crossed the street and took more pictures.
 The driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer is unlikely to be prosecuted, according to the police.
 There are only eighteen medals awarded each day, so many countries missed out on the podium.
 Among them are the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen was ninth yesterday in the standing for women in the Super-G, and Finland, where Katja Saarinen was tenth in the same event.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley finished eleventh of the men in the standing Super-G, while his Czech opponent Oldrich Jelinek finished sixteenth in the sitting Super-G.
 Arly Velasquez of Mexico ended up in the fifteenth place in the men's Super-G,
 The blind Polish skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska were thirteenth in the Super-G.
 The UN peacekeeping force, which came to Haiti after the earthquake of 2010, is blamed for the spread of the disease that broke out at the camp of the troops.
 It has been proven in the court of law that the waste from the UN camp was poorly treated, and this allowed bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, which is one of the largest rivers in Haiti.
 Haiti had been free of the disease since 1800, until the troops arrived.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti spoke of independent students who said the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion had brought the disease with it to Haiti without knowing.
 According to Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, the outbreak is likely caused by the peacekeepers.
 The strain of bird flu lethal to humans, H5N1, has been confirmed to have infected a dead wild duck, found on Monday, in marshland near Lyon in the east of France.
 The patient had been to Nigeria, where the Ebola virus was already present in small numbers.
 The hospital followed the protocol for infection control, including the isolation of the patient to prevent others from being infected.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon worked in various capacities on a number of series.
 In the eighty s he worked on shows like Taxi, Cheers, and the Tracy Ullman show.
 In 1989, he worked with Brooks and Groening on The Simpsons and was responsible for recruiting the first writing team.
 After his departure from the series in 1993, he remained on paper as executive producer, which earned him royalties for every episode, worth several tens of millions of dollars.
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua reported earlier that a plane had been hijacked.
 Later reports also indicate that there was a bomb threat in the plane, which caused it to be diverted to Kandahar.
 First reports indicate that the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after it was not allowed to make an emergency landing in Ürümqi.
 Airplane crashes are common in Iran, which has an aging fleet for both civilian and military operations.
 International sanctions mean no new planes can be bought.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, Iran experienced the worst airplane crash in years when a plane that was on its way to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 In the same month, a passenger plane crashed on a runway at Mashhad, killing seventeen people.
 Aerosmith has canceled the rest of their tour.
 The tour of the rock band would travel through the USA and Canada until the sixteenth of September.
 They cancelled the tour after singer Steven Tyler injured himself when he fell off the stage during a performance on August 5.
 Murray lost the first set in a tiebreak after both men had failed to win a single point on their serves.
 Del Potro had an early break in the second set, but here too a tiebreak followed after it was 6-6.
 Potro was treated for his shoulder, but managed to continue the match.
 The local start time of the program was 20.30 hours,
 Famous singers from all over the country sang bhajans or religious songs at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The evening began with singer Sanju Sharma, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary.
 Lakkha Singh then sang the bhajans.
 To Baba Shyam, 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog were served,
 Lakkha Singh also presented the Chhappan bhog bhajan, with the singer Raju Khandelwal assisting him.
 On Thursday, Nintendo's director, Satoru Iwata, unveiled the design of the controller for the new Nintendo Revolution during the Tokyo Game Show keynote presentation.
 Just like a TV remote, the Controller uses two sensors near the television to determine its position in three-dimensional space.
 With this, players control actions and movements in video games by moving the device through the air.
 Shortly after the start, Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and retired from the race.
 His teammate, Fernando Alonso, led most of the race, but lost the lead directly after his pit stop, probably due to a badly placed right front wheel.
 Michael Schumacher ended his race not long after Alonso, due to the damage to the wheel suspension from the many duels during the race.
 In a transcript of the news conference, he said, quote, she was a cute little girl with a nice voice.
 I was moved every time we repeated this, from the bottom of my heart.
 On an internal camera, it was seen that about 3 minutes after launch, many pieces of insulation foam detached from the fuel tank.
 It is believed that these did not cause any damage to the shuttle.
 The director of NASA's shuttle program, N . Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam had fallen after the period we had been concerned about.
 After five minutes the wind begins, and a minute later it reaches 70 km an hour,
 I lost my sister and her friend, and when I tried to get to them, people were just pushing wheelchair users over.
 In addition, the NHK reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating as normal.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reports that the earthquake did not cause any problems and that reactors 1 and 2 at the Shika nuclear power plant have been shut down.
 According to reports, there are 9,400 households in the region without water and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads have been damaged, the railway service has been suspended in the affected areas, and the Prefecture of the Noto Airport in Ishikawa Prefecture has been closed for an extended period.
 One bomb has exploded outside the office of the governor-general.
 Within a period of two hours, three more bombs exploded in the vicinity of government buildings.
 In some reports, the official death toll is estimated at eight, while official reports confirm a maximum of 30 wounded.
 In urine samples from pets that had died after eating contaminated pet food, both cyanide and melamine were found.
 Researchers at the University of Sydney have found that two proteins interact with each other,
 Scientists found out that crystals are formed in cat urine when you add Melanin and Cyanuric acid to it.
 The composition of these crystals has similarities with that of the urine of the affected pets, compared with infrared spectroscopy.
 I do not know if you realize this, but most of the goods from Central America entered this country without paying any duty.
 And yet, eighty percent of our goods were taxed at rates from countries in the Middle Americas.
 I found that to be extremely unfair.
 I just want to say that we treat you the way you treat us.
 Arnold Schwarzenegger, the governor of California, has signed a bill into law that will ban the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 Under this law, violent Video games that are sold in the state of California must have an '18' sticker.
 Kier Starmer QC, the director of the CPS, said this morning that he would prosecute both Pryce and Huhne.
 Huhne has resigned, and in the cabinet, Ed Davey is his replacement, while Norman Lamb is expected to take over Davey's role as Minister of Trade.
 Huhne and Pryce are expected to appear before the Westminster Magistrates Court on 16 February.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21, who was the driver of the vehicle.
 Edgar Veguilla was injured in the arm and the jaw, and Kristoffer Schneider had to undergo a reconstructive facial operation.
 The Uka's weapon failed as he aimed it at the head of a fifth man, Schneider has chronic pain, is blind in one eye, has a piece of his skull missing, and his face has been reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider gave his statement via a Video-Link from a U S . Air Force base in the country from which he had come.
 In addition to Wednesday's event, Carpanedo also competed in two individual races of the championship.
 Her first was the Slalom, where she got a Did Not Finish at her first run, 36 of the 116 participants got the same result in that race.
 In the other event she competed in, the standing Grote Slalom, she was tenth of the ladies, with a combined time of 4:41:30, which is 2:11:60 minutes slower than the Austrian winner, Claudia Loesch, and 1:09:02 minutes slower than the Hungarian Gyöngyi Dani, who finished ninth.
 Four skiers from the women's slalom group failed to finish their runs, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the giant slalom failed to place themselves during the race.
 The stolen laptop and mobile phone have been recovered by the Madhya Pradesh police.
 According to deputy inspector-general D. K. Arya, five of the rapists of the Swedish woman have been arrested and they have found her mobile phone and laptop.
 Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar are the suspects.
 According to police Commissioner Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the suspects had their faces covered when they appeared in court.
 There were three people inside the house when the car hit the house, but none of them were injured.
 The driver, however, suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while the emergency services tried to free the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially admitted to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya has since been sentenced in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court for the murder of her son.
 She is in custody awaiting the charge and trial, but the eye-witness account is possibly doctored because her story has been published many times.
 This is standard practice in the rest of the UK, but justice in Scotland works differently and courts have deemed publication of the photos as potentially prejudicial.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee remarks that, quote, journalists are playing a dangerous game when they publish photos of suspects.
 The crown office has overall control over prosecutions and has told journalists that no further statements are being made, at least until charges are laid.
 According to sources, the document refers to a settlement, something the Palestinians have long wanted on the basis of the borders before the war in the Middle East in 1967.
 Other topics discussed were the future status of Jerusalem, a city holy to both peoples, and the problems in the Jordan Valley.
 Israel insists that a permanent military presence be maintained in the valley for ten years after the signing of the agreement, while the PA is only willing to allow a five-year presence.
 Hunters in the supplementary pest control trial had to be closely monitored by gamekeepers, as the trial was being followed and its effectiveness was being assessed.
 In collaboration with the NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia, qualified volunteers were recruited for the Sporting Shooters Association's hunting program.
 According to Mick O'Flynn, acting director of park conservation and heritage at the NPWS, the four chosen shooters had an extensive safety and training instruction.
 Martelly swore in a nine-member provisional electoral Council of CEP.
 In the past four years, Martelly has won five CEP elections.
 Last month, the Presidential Commission recommended the dismissal of the former National Election Commission, as part of a package of measures to bring about new elections in the country.
 The Commission was set up by Martelly as a response to the widespread protests against the government that have been taking place since October.
 The sometimes violent protests were sparked by the failure to hold elections, some of which had been scheduled since 2011.
 There have been about 60 reported cases of defective iPods that overheated, resulting in six total fires and four people with minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said it was aware of the 27 incidents linked to the devices.
 Last week, METI announced that apple had reported 34 additional incidents of overheating that the company called not serious.
 The Ministry of Agriculture, however,
 Mariana was hit by the earthquake at 07.19 local time,
 The office of emergency management in the Northern Mariana Islands reported that no damage had been reported.
 In addition, the National Tsunami Warning Center reported that there was no tsunami warning.
 In Manila, the Philippine capital, a former Filipino policeman has hijacked a bus full of Hong Kong tourists.
 With his M16 rifle, Rolando Mendoza shot the tourists.
 Several hostages have been rescued, and at least six fatalities have been confirmed.
 Six hostages were released earlier, including the children and the elderly, and the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers returned later in exchange for an older woman who had to go to the toilet, and Mendoza was eventually shot.
 Liggins went into medicine, following in the footsteps of his father.
 Trained as a midwife, he began working in the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 When he was working at the hospital, Liggins did research into premature birth in his spare time.
 His research showed that the maturation of the baby's lung tissue was accelerated by the administration of a hormone.
 The use of Video-Recordings has led to important discoveries in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions,
 Also, fellow wrestlers paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy Dreamer said, Luna was the first Queen of Extreme. My first manager. Luna passed away on the night of two moons.
 Dustin Runnels stated that Luna was as weird as he was,
 Of the 1,400 people surveyed for the 2010 Federal election, the number of people who opposed Australia becoming a Republic rose by 8 per cent since 2008.
 Demissionary Prime Minister Julia Gillard said during the campaign for the 2010 Federal Election that Australia should become a Republic after the reign of Queen Elizabeth II.
 Thirty four percent of those polled supported this view, and wanted Queen Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 Twenty nine percent of respondents said that Australia should become a Republic as soon as it is possible, and at the other end of the scale, thirty one percent said it should never become a Republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist swam the 100 and 200 metre freestyle and three relay events during the Commonwealth games, but his fitness was questioned because of his complaints.
 He couldn't take the medication he needed to ease his pain because it was banned at the Olympics.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered on January 25th the currently largest known prime number.
 Several people verified the discovery using different hardware and software in early February, and it was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets could have been a source of water and organic material that formed proteins and supports life.
 Scientists hope to gain insight into how planets form, and in particular, how the earth was formed, given that it has been a very long time since comets have collided with the earth.
 Cuomo, who was inaugurated as governor this year, signed a law last month legalizing same-sex marriages.
 He called the rumors political nonsense and gossip.
 It is speculated that he will run for the Presidency in 2016.
 With the NextGen system, planes would be able to take shorter routes, according to the FAA, which would save millions of tons of fuel and lower carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite-based technology, unlike older technologies with ground-based radars, which allows air traffic controllers to locate aircraft much more accurately, and to give pilots much clearer information.
 No additional transport is being used and no above-ground trains are stopping at Wembley, and parking and P and R are not accessible on the site.
 A possible lack of transportation made it more likely that the match would be played behind closed doors and without supporters.
 A study published Tuesday in the scientific Journal Science, looked at the formation of a new bird species on the Galapagos Islands in Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden reported that new species evolved within two generations.
 Gold can be worked into many shapes. It can be rolled into small shapes.
 It can be drawn into a narrow thread that can be wound and woven, it can be forged into a narrow rod,
 After it has been made very thin, it can be pasted onto another metal, and it can even be made so thin that it is sometimes used for the decoration of hand-painted illustrations in books, which are called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called the pH-value of a chemical substance. You are already making an indicator with the help of red cabbage juice.
 The color of the cabbage juice changes based on the acidity of the chemical.
 The pH value is given by the amount of hydrogen ions in the chemical substance that is being tested.
 Hydrogen atoms consist of one proton and one electron, and hydrogen ions are protons without electrons.
 Mix both dry powders together, make your hands wet and clean, and make a ball of it.
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which feels odd and forms a sort of a coating.
 In the cities of Harappa and Mohenjodaro, almost every house had a flush toilet that was connected to an advanced sewage system.
 There are sewerage remains found in houses in the Minoan cities on the Greek Islands of Crete and Santorini.
 There were also toilets in China, Egypt and Persia in the olden days.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you make use of a satellite.
 As soon as the space satellite receives the call, it immediately sends it back.
 The satellite is shot into space by a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts some of the light and image.
 In order to launch a satellite or telescope into space, you need to have a huge rocket that is more than 30 meters long.
 The wheel has changed the world immensely, and the most important thing it has given us is an easier and quicker transport.
 The train, the car, and many other means of transportation are the result.
 There are medium-sized cats that eat medium-sized prey, from hares to antelopes and deer.
 In addition, there are many small cats, such as stray cats, that hunt small prey, such as insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 Their success comes from the idea of a niche, a special job that each cat has, which prevents them from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social of cats and live in large groups called prides.
 Troops consist of one to three adult males who are related and also have up to thirty females and cubs.
 The women are normally related to each other and form a large family of sisters and daughters.
 A pride of lions behaves much like a pack of wolves or dogs, animals that are surprisingly much alike in their behaviour,
 The tiger is a versatile athlete and can climb, although not well, swim, jump great distances and has five times the pulling power of a strong man.
 The tiger belongs to the same genus as lions, leopards, and jaguars,
 A tiger does not roar as loudly as a lion, but more like a whole sentence.
 Ocelots' favorite meal is small prey, such as monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scholars suspect that ocelots use their sense of smell to hunt small animals by smelling the ground where their prey has been.
 They can see in the dark and move about very stealthily,
 When a small group of organisms breaks away from the large population from which they originated,
 In this new environment, different raw materials and different enemies appear, so the new population must adapt or die.
 Because they still need the same adaptations as before, the original population has not changed at all.
 As the new population began to adapt to the new environment, they also began to look less and less like the other population.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will be so different in appearance that you can no longer call them the same species.
 This process is called speciation and it is simply the formation of new species.
 Plants produce oxygen that humans breathe in and they take in carbon dioxide that humans breathe out.
 Through photosynthesis, plants use the sun's energy to make food from carbon dioxide and water.
 Our houses and clothing are made from plants, we eat mostly plants, and without plants, animals would not survive.
 The Mosasaurus stood at the top of the food chain from that time, and had nothing to fear from any other Mosasaurus.
 His long jaws had more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, plus an extra set in the roof of his mouth, which means nothing or no one could escape.
 It is not certain, but it is possible that his tongue was forked, and that it ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and possibly even his own kind.
 In water, nothing was safe from the attacks of the Tyrannosaurus Rex, even huge dinosaurs like the Tyrannosaurus Rex.
 Although the majority of their food would be familiar to us, the Romans also had their fair share of strange or unusual delicacies, including wild boar, peacocks, snails and a kind of rodent that was called a pigmy mouse.
 In addition, there was a difference in the way that poor people and women sat during meals, but rich men liked to have a banquet where they could lounge on their sides while eating.
 Meals from the Roman Empire contain no foods that were introduced from the Americas or from Asia.
 They didn't have, for example, maize, tomatoes, potatoes, cacao, and no ancient Roman ever ate a chicken.
 The Babylonians made a primary temple for each of their gods, and this temple was seen as the home of that particular deity.
 People made offerings to the gods and priests tried to satisfy the gods' needs by organizing ceremonies and festivals.
 Every temple had an open courtyard and a rear room that was only accessible to priests.
 Sometimes, as part of the temple, there would be a pyramid-shaped tower, called a ziggurat.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 Houses were not of great importance in the warm climate of the Middle East.
 The daily life of the Hebrew family took place mostly outdoors.
 Women cooked in the garden, and shops were little more than a counter along the street.
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests, and therefore wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland had few inhabitants, and according to Norse legends, Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder,
 He made this discovery, but there were Eskimo tribes living there at the time.
 Although all of these were Scandinavian countries, the people, the Royal family, customs, and history of Sweden, Iceland, Denmark, and Norway were all very different.
 Perhaps after watching the movie National Treasure, you think there is a treasure map hidden behind the Declaration of Independence.
 There is no treasure map on the back of the card, however,
 On the back of the American Declaration of Independence, the words, 'Original Declaration of Independence, July 4, 1776', are written upside down at the bottom of the document.
 Although no one is certain who wrote it, it is certain that the large parchment, which is 29¾ inches by 24½ inches, was once rolled up for storage.
 It seems that the term was added as a label.
 Thanks to the D-Day landings and the fighting that followed, the North of France was liberated, but the South remained occupied.
 It was ruled by Vichy France, which was a group of French people who sided with the Nazis instead of fighting against them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France with Operation Dragoon.
 The Americans and the Free French had liberated Southern France within just two weeks, and then they set off to liberate Germany.
 A civilization is a single culture shared by a large group of people who live and work together in a society.
 From the Latin civilis, which means civil, comes the term civilization, related to the Latin civis, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city-state, and that defines also in a certain way the size of the society.
 Cities are the forerunners of nations, a civilization with a culture suggests that knowledge is passed on over multiple generations, a permanent cultural footprint and a balanced distribution.
 When minority cultures disappear, they often leave no relevant historical evidence, and so are not officially recognized as civilizations.
 During the revolution, thirteen states under the articles of Confederation formed a weak central government, consisting only of a Congress.
 The Congress lacked the power to levy taxes, because there was no national executive or judicial authority, and for the enforcement of all its decisions it relied on state authorities,
 It also did not have the power to override state laws on taxation and tariffs.
 First, all the states had to unanimously agree to the articles before they could be amended, but the states did not take the national government so seriously,
 The Italian national football team is, together with the German team, the second most successful team in the world, having won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and F1 motor racing.
 Winter sports are especially popular in the northern regions, where Italians participate in international competitions and Olympic events.
 Japan consists of nearly 7,000 Islands, with Honshu being the largest.
 Because of the cluster of Islands that Japan possesses, Japan is geographically often referred to as a Peninsula.
 The history of Taiwan begins in the 15th century, when sailors from Europe sailed past the island and gave it the name Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company established a base in the southwest of Taiwan, where the Dutch East India company set up a base and used Chinese labourers to work on rice and sugar plantations.
 In the year 1683, the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan were conquered by the Qing dynasty,
 In the aftermath of the Qing dynasty's defeat in the first Sino-Japanese war,
 Built up of three large structures, Machu Picchu consists of Intihuatana, the temple of the sun, and the room with three windows.
 The largest part of the buildings at the edges of the complex have been rebuilt so that tourists can get a better idea of how they looked before.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored.
 For example, worldwide, the most common photographic format for still images is 35 mm, which was the usual film format in the late era of analogue photography.
 These are still produced today, although it is the ratio of the image that the digital camera's image sensor has taken over.
 Strangely enough, 35 mm film is actually 36 mm wide, with a height of 24 mm.
 The aspect ratio of this size, dividing by twelve to get the simplest whole number ratio, would be 3:2.
 Many common indelings, for example, APS-like indelings, are equal to or a close approximation of this aspect ratio.
 The rule of thirds, which is often misused and ridiculed by many, is a simple guideline that makes the image dynamic, yet also keeps it organized.
 The most effective place for the main subject is at the intersection of the lines, so you divide the image vertically and horizontally into three parts.
 In this period of European history, the rich and powerful Catholic Church was under fire.
 For more than a thousand years, Christianity has united European states, despite linguistic and cultural differences.
 From the King to the commoner, his all-pervading power had influence on everyone.
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the church has resources to do this.
 The church had been the central authority in Rome for over a thousand years, and this relationship of power and money led many people to question whether this principle was being upheld.
 Britain set up a blockade of the German ports,
 The strategy proved effective, as it was no longer possible to deliver vital supplies to civilians and military personnel.
 Britain had laid mines in international waters, so that no ships could sail in whole areas of the ocean, which was dangerous even for neutral ships.
 Because of the limited response to this tactic, Germany expected a similar reaction to the unrestrained undersea warfare of the country.
 During the nineteen twenty s, most citizens and nations had a pacifist and isolationist attitude.
 After the first World War, nations wanted to prevent such horrors from ever happening again.
 Tesla emigrated to the United States in 1884 to work at the Edison company in New York City.
 When he came to the United States, he had only 4 cents, a collection of poems and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 The old China had a unique way of representing different periods of time,
 Also between the different dynasties there was an unstable period in which the provinces were divided.
 In those days there were fierce wars between different nobles who fought for the throne.
 In the history of ancient China, the period of the Three Kingdoms is remembered as one of the bloodiest.
 The revolution had huge social and political consequences, such as the adoption of the metric system, a shift from absolute monarchy to republicanism, nationalism, and the idea that the land belongs to its people instead of a single leader.
 For all male applicants, there were positions to be had after the revolution, so that the most ambitious and suitable candidates could succeed.
 The same is true of the Army, where ranks are no longer based on a person's class but on the caliber of the person.
 The French Revolution inspired the underprivileged working class in other countries to revolt.
 Mohammed spent a great deal of time in the supernatural, going for meditation to a cave in the mountains of Noor, which later became known as the cave of Hira.
 The cave itself, which has withstood the ravages of time, gives a very vivid picture of Muhammad's spirituality.
 The cave is located on one of the mountains surrounding Mecca and is completely sealed off from the rest of the world.
 Even though the cave was known to exist, it was not easy to find, and once inside, total isolation reigned.
 The only thing to be seen is the clear, beautiful sky and the many surrounding mountains.
 The only one of the seven wonders of the world that still stands is the great pyramid of Giza.
 The great pyramid was built in the third century BC by the Egyptians and is one of the many great pyramid structures erected to honour a deceased pharaoh.
 The plateau of Giza or the Giza plateau in the Egyptian valley of the Kings contains several pyramids, including the great pyramid, several smaller tombs, a number of temples, and the great Sphinx.
 The great pyramid was built to honor Pharaoh Khufu, and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built as tributes to Khufu's wives and family members.
 The up-bow sign looks like a V and the down-bow sign looks like a notch or a square with the bottom cut out.
 If you visit the Arctic or Antarctic areas in the winter you will experience the polar night, which means that the sun doesn't rise above the horizon.
 An upward movement usually gives a softer sound, while a downward movement produces a stronger and more assertive sound.
 Take the liberty of sketching your personal marks, but remember that the printed staff lines are there for a musical reason, and so should be respected.
 A group of market women sat on October 6, 1789, behind the departure of the doomed Louis XVI, Marie Antoinette and their two young children, Marie-Therese, age 11, and Louis-Charles, age 4,
 They drove back to the French capital in a carriage, surrounded by cheering and threatening mobs.
 The crowd forced the King and the queen to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 At one point, a man in the crowd held up the head of a Royal guard who had been murdered in Versailles,
 The war costs of U S . imperialism with regard to the conquest of the Philippines have been paid by the Filipino people.
 They were imposed on the American colonial regime to pay taxes, to finance a large part of the costs, and the interest on bonds was issued through the banks on Wall Street in the name of the Philippine government.
 American imperialism rested in large part on the enormous profits of the long-term exploitation of the Philippines.
 To understand the Templars, one must know the context that gave rise to the order.
 The time period in which this happened is commonly referred to as the High Middle Ages, the European history of the 11th, 12th, and 13th centuries.
 After the early Middle Ages came the high Middle Ages, which were in turn followed by the late Middle Ages, usually ending around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term for a wide assortment of ideas in practice: from technological necessity or the technological imperative to a strict sense that human destiny is driven by an underlying logic that is linked to scientific laws and the appearance of those laws in technology.
 The most common interpretations of technological determinism have these two general views: the development of technology follows a trajectory that for the most part extends beyond cultural or political influence, and that technology in turn has effects on societies that are inherent rather than socially conditioned.
 Some will argue, for example, that the coming of the car automatically leads to the building of roads.
 A national road network is economically not feasible for but a few cars, so new production methods are being developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 The massive car ownership also leads to more road accidents and this leads to the development of new technologies in the field of health care to repair the human body.
 In the romanticism, a large part of cultural determinism was included, which came from writers like Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the Romanticism, geography formed the individual and after a while, customs and cultures emerged according to this geography, which formed a harmonious society and were better than the arbitrary laws imposed.
 Constantinople was the fashion capital of feudal Europe, just as Paris is the fashion capital of the modern world.
 It stood from about 400 BC to about 1100 AD as a centre of luxury.
 The status of the empire declined in the twelfth century, mainly because the crusaders returned with silk and spices that were more valuable than what the Byzantine markets could offer.
 Around this time, Paris also took the title of fashion capital from Constantinople.
 The Gothic period flourished in the 10th, 11th, and 14th centuries.
 Clothing was at first strongly influenced by the Byzantine culture from the East.
 But because of the slow communication channels, styles in the West lagged 25 to 30 years behind.
 At the end of the Middle Ages, a new style began to develop in Western Europe, one of the greatest developments was the result of the Crusades,
 Self-sufficiency is the ability of a country to produce enough food to feed its own people.
 Agriculture, with a view to subsistence, is a simple system that is usually biological, using stored seed from the ecoregion, and combining it with varying crops or other relatively simple techniques to maximize the yield.
 In the past, most farmers worked in self-sufficient agriculture, and in many developing countries, this is still the case.
 Subcultures are groups of people who are similar in some way,
 Subcultures may be distinguished by age, ethnicity, social class, location, and/or gender of their members.
 A subculture can be defined by the following types of qualities: linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, geographic, or a combination of these factors.
 Members of a subculture often show their allegiance to a group by wearing certain symbols,
 One of the most used methods for illustrating the importance of socialization was the pair of unfortunate cases of children who, through neglect, adversity or wilful misuse,
 They are called Wolf-Children or wild children, some of them were locked up by humans, usually their own parents, sometimes this child was abandoned because the parents did not want to accept the severe mental or physical disability of the child.
 Unmanageable children may have experienced severe childhood trauma or abuse before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Some have been claimed to have been raised by animals, and some are said to have lived only in the wilderness.
 A wild child who is not raised by humans may exhibit behavior that resembles the behavior of the animal that raised the child,
 Learning on a project basis should simplify and make education more interesting, but scaffolding goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a method of teaching but a tool to support individuals who are dealing with a new learning experience, such as a new computer program or who are starting a new project.
 Support can be virtual or real, a teacher is one form of support, but the paperclip in Microsoft office is also a form of support.
 There is virtual scaffolding built into the software that asks questions, provides memory aids and explains procedures that may be difficult to understand without help.
 There are several reasons why children end up in the foster care system, such as neglect, abuse, and exploitation.
 No child should grow up in an environment where they are not well cared for, where they are not loved and where they cannot develop.
 The foster care system is considered a safe zone for these children.
 The goal is to provide a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education, and reliable health care.
 In foster care, all needs that were neglected in the earlier home must be met.
 The Internet has merged interpersonal and mass communication.
 The different characters of the Internet lead to new dimensions in the application of the Uses and Gratifications theory.
 Learning and socialization are cited as important reasons for using the Internet.
 Eighmey and McCord introduced new motivation aspects such as personal involvement and sustained relationships when they investigated audience responses to Websites.
 The use of Video-Recordings has led to some remarkable findings in the interpretation of Micro-Expressions, which are facial movements that last a few milliseconds.
 It is claimed that no one can detect a lie by looking only at micro-expressions.
 Oliver Sacks described in his essay The President's Speech how people who cannot understand speech because of brain damage can nevertheless accurately gauge its sincerity.
 He even suggested that other animal species, such as domestic dogs, also have the ability to interpret human behaviour.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two groups of genetic varieties, hidden and visible.
 Mutation adds new genetic variation, and selection eliminates it from the pool of expressed variation.
 For each generation, there is variation between the two groups by means of separation and recombination.
 A primate with a digestive system that resembles that of humans can, on the savanna,
 Further non-compliance can have serious consequences: stunted growth, malnutrition and eventually death.
 The easiest to find are the proteins in leaves and legumes, but unless they are cooked,
 Not only is animal food (ants, termites, eggs) lightly digestible, but it also contains a lot of proteins that contain all the essential amino acids.
 All in all, we should not be surprised if our ancestors solved their protein problem in the same way as chimpanzees on the savanna solve theirs today.
 Sleep disturbance refers to being awakened during your normal sleep period and then falling back to sleep within a short period of time,
 This is quite easy to do by using a relatively soft alarm clock that brings you back to your awareness without immediately waking you up.
 If you set your alarm clock in your sleep, you can place it on the other side of the room so that you have to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other options based on the biorhythm include drinking a lot of fluid before you go to bed,
 The amount of inner calm that a person possesses is inversely proportional to the amount of stress that a person carries in his or her body and mind.
 The less stress, the more positive the life force, and every human being is capable of attaining total peace and contentment.
 Everyone can enlighten his or her mind. Only your own stress and negativity stand in the way of this.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but it has been enriched with the Mahayana path of love and with a great number of techniques from Indian yoga.
 Tibetan Buddhism consists of a relatively simple core of Kundalini yoga, meditation, and a following of universal love.
 Through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visualized images, the energy of Kundalini-Yoga is awakened.
 The core of Tibetan meditation is yoga with a focus on a deity,
 Because Germany was a common enemy in the Second World War, a cooperation between the USSR and the USA came to be.
 The former allies stood two years after the war, this was the beginning of the cold war.
 The war would last for 40 years and there were proxy wars fought on battlefields in Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 The Polish defensive forces held out until 17 September 1939, when they were forced to retreat and reorganize along the bridgehead in Romania.
 These plans were, however, in one night, overtaken, when 800,000 soldiers from the Red Army of the Soviet Union invaded the Eastern parts of Poland,
 Goods transported by ship is the most efficient way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the ocean.
 Traditionally, it is the job of the Navy to ensure that a country has the ability to transport people and goods, while the ability of the enemy to transport people and goods is hampered.
 The U S . tried to get troops and equipment across the Atlantic to the British, and with this North Atlantic campaign of WW II, it's one of the most remarkable recent examples.
 The German Navy tried to counter this traffic with U-Boats.
 Like the rest of Europe, Britain would probably have been in German hands if the Allies had failed.
 It is believed that goats were first domesticated in the Zagros mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 In the olden days, cultures and tribes began to keep them so that they could always get easy access to her, meat, milk and skins.
 Domesticated goats were usually kept in herds on a hill or other grazing area, and were tended by a goat herder, often a child or younger person.
 In the sixteenth century, England had horse railways.
 Although horse-drawn railways consisted only of a rails of planks, the horses had to travel faster and pull greater loads than on the somewhat difficult roads of that time.
 Dwarfing the rails, and gradually realizing that rails would be more efficient if they had a point at the top.
 This soon became the customary practice, but the iron resulted in more wear and tear on the wooden coach wheels.
 Iron wheels eventually replaced the wooden varieties, and in 1767 the first fully iron rails were laid.
 The first form of transportation that we know of is walking,
 Their predecessor, Australopithecus, walked upright less often.
 In fossils of the Australopithecus, dating from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago,
 We can live in a more environmentally friendly way, join an environmental movement, or even take action to mitigate future environmental harm.
 It is in many cases just like a symptomatic treatment, but if we want more than a temporary solution, we have to address the root cause of the problems.
 The scientific and technological developments of human society have obviously changed the earth greatly.
 The Declaration of independence was sent to the printer John Dunlap's shop a few blocks away.
 Between one hundred and two hundred copies were printed during the night, and are now better known as the Dunlap broadsides.
 John Nixon held the public reading of the document for the first time on July 8 in the garden of Independence hall.
 One copy was sent to George Washington on July 6 and read to his troops in New York on July 9.
 The 25 Dunlap-Blair copies are the oldest surviving copies of the document, the original handwritten copy having perished.
 Many paleontologists believe that dinosaurs still exist today. We call them birds.
 Many people do not consider them to be dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are many things about birds that still make us think of dinosaurs.
 On their feet are claws and scales, they lay eggs and walk on their two hind legs, just like the Tyrannosaurus Rex.
 The manipulation of data encoded in Binary digits forms the basis of almost all computers in use today.
 A Binary number can only have two values, 0 or 1, and these numbers are called Binary digits, or Binary digits.
 Internal poisoning is possible, but symptoms like vomiting are so common that it is not immediately clear.
 The presence of open boxes of medication or toxic household chemicals is the best indicator of internal poisoning.
 Check the label for specific first aid instructions for that particular poison.
 Entomologists formally call this insect group the order of Hemiptera.
 This term comes from an ancient agreement with bedbugs, which are insects that can parasitize very well on humans.
 Both red and bed bugs are nest-bound, they have adapted to live in the nest or home of their host.
 In the USA, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis, making it the most common neurological condition in adults of both younger and middle age.
 The central nervous system is the part of the body that controls the brain, spinal cord, and nerves.
 Research has shown that women are twice as likely to get MS as men.
 A couple may decide that it is not in their best interest, or that of their child, to raise a baby.
 These couples may choose to give their baby up for adoption.
 In an adoption, the parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 Discovering how the world works through the scientific method is the main goal of science.
 A trial is more than just a test to exclude, question, and observe, as a guide for scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers turned to classical texts, and in particular to the Bible in Latin.
 The views of Aristotle with regard to science, including psychology, were accepted.
 The West, on the other hand, understood Greek philosophy and science less and less as the knowledge of the Greek language declined.
 In physiological and behavioral observations of rhythms, there is often a strong dependence on endogenous processes and the production via the biological clock.
 Most living things, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals, live by periodic rhythms,
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining oscillators that go through a cycle for a certain period of time, even if there are no external signals to trigger it.
 The experiment of Hershey and Chase was one of the most important indications that DNA was a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used bacteriophages or viruses to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 Two experiments were performed, one using radioactive phosphorus to mark the DNA in the virus,
 Mutations can have many different effects, depending on the type, the importance of the genetic material involved, and whether the affected cells are dividing or not.
 Only mutations in germ cells are heritable, and other mutations can cause cells to die or can cause cancer.
 Nature tourism attracts people who like to visit natural areas, such as the landscape, flora and fauna.
 Here, one can go bird watching, fishing, photography, bird watching, and study the ecosystem.
 An example is a visit to, photographing and learning about the orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people from small villages drive to their workplaces and pass people whose workplaces are in the village from which they have just come.
 Everyone in this dynamic transportation shuttle is in some way connected to and supports a transportation system based on private cars.
 The science shows that through this huge carbon economy, the biosphere is no longer in the stable state that allowed human evolution to take place over the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in society and uses transport systems, and almost everyone complains about them.
 In developed countries, problems with water quality or collapsing bridges are rarely encountered.
 How is it that in transport systems,
 In traffic flow, we look at the movements of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions that take place between the individuals.
 Unfortunately, it is difficult to examine the traffic flow, because the behaviour of drivers cannot be predicted with 100% certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers behave in a reasonably predictable way, which means that traffic flows show some degree of consistency and that there is some scope for mathematical analysis.
 There are links between the three core characteristics to better represent traffic flow: intensity, density and speed.
 With the help of these relationships, it is easier to plan, design and operate road engineering facilities.
 Insects began as the first animals to fly,
 The advantage of most insects is that they can fold their wings along the body.
 This allows them to hide in a greater number of small places from predators.
 At present, only dragonflies and mayflies cannot fold their wings.
 A few thousand years ago, Aristarchus said that the sun rotated around the sun.
 There were some people who thought he was right, but many people believed the opposite, that the sun, moon, and stars were all moving around the earth.
 This sounds reasonable, because you don't feel the earth moving, do you?
 The Amazon River is the world's largest and second longest river, carrying more than eight times the volume of water that the second largest river carries.
 The Amazon is also the widest river on earth, and at some points it is six miles wide.
 At least 20% of all water that flows into the sea via rivers comes from the Amazon.
 The main stem of the Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long. The water comes from thousands of smaller rivers.
 Although the building of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the pyramids of Giza remain unsurpassed in size and technical excellence of construction.
 The ancient Egyptians of the new Kingdom admired the monument of their predecessors, which was then more than a thousand years old.
 There are about eight hundred people living in Vatican city, which is the smallest independent country in the world and also the country with the lowest population.
 Italian is the official language of the Vatican City,
 Italian is the most widely spoken language, while Latin is used during religious ceremonies.
 Everyone who lives in the Vatican is Roman Catholic.
 People have known the most basic chemical elements, such as gold, silver and copper, from the ancient world, because they are all found in nature and it is fairly easy to extract them with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle speculated that everything is made up of a mixture of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air and fire.
 This seemed more like the four states of matter we know of in the same order: solid, liquid, gas and plasma, but he also theorized that they would change into new substances to form what we see.
 Legions are, in a sense, combinations of at least two metals.
 Elements like calcium and potassium fall under the metals, but there are also metals like silver and gold.
 Alloys can also contain a small amount of non-metal elements, for example, carbon.
 All of the universe is made up of matter, all matter is made up of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly small that a trillion atoms would fit into the tip of a pencil.
 The pencil was a faithful friend to many when it was first launched.
 The pen has unfortunately been downgraded in status and is used much less frequently.
 Today, however, most people write on a computer screen without ever needing to use a typewriter.
 You might wonder what's going to happen to the keyboard once something new comes out.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that it takes energy to bring a nucleus together with many protons and neutrons.
 Also, like pushing a heavy cart up a hill, as the core is re-split, some of the energy is released.
 Some atoms have an unstable nucleus, which means that they will fall apart at the slightest provocation.
 The surface of the moon is characterized by dust and rock, the crust being the outermost layer of the moon.
 The crust is about 70 km thick at the nearest point and about 100 km thick at the farthest point.
 The crust is thinner under the Maria and thicker under the highlands.
 There may be more mares on the side, because the crust is thinner there, and lava could have flowed to the surface more easily.
 Content theories are concerned with trying to understand what motivates people and what they find attractive.
 This theory suggests that people have certain needs and or desires that are internalized as they mature.
 With these theories, they want to examine the reasons why certain people want certain things and what environmental factors influence them to do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Hertzberg's two-factor theory.
 Overall, there are two main ways managers try to lead their former colleagues.
 This type of manager finds it difficult to take unpopular decisions and to discipline, to have performance reviews, to delegate and to hold people accountable.
 On the other side of the spectrum, this person transforms into an unrecognizable individual.
 Ultimately, the leader is responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 This often leads to a rift between the leaders and the team members.
 Virtual teams must meet the same standards of excellence as normal teams, although there are some small differences.
 In most cases, virtual team members are the first point of contact for their direct physical group.
 Often, they're more independent than traditional team members, because their teams can meet across different time zones, which may not be understood by their local management.
 The idea of a truly invisible team, Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p 109, is a unique element of a virtual team.
 The invisible team is the management team to whom each member reports, and the invisible team sets the standard for each member.
 Why would an organization want to begin the time-consuming process of setting up a learning organization? One of the goals for implementing organizational learning concepts is innovation.
 Creativity and ingenuity come to the fore when all the resources available within the functional departments of an organization are effectively deployed.
 The result of this is that the process of an organization working together to overcome a barrier can lead to a new innovative process to meet the needs of the customer.
 In order to enable innovation in an organization, management must create a culture that encourages innovation, shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 According to Angel,
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition, thereby allowing the research field to be narrowed and allowing more precise data to be collected.
 The correlation between the pathology of the brain and behavior helps scientists during their research.
 It has long been known that various types of brain injury, trauma, wounds and tumors can affect behavior and lead to changes in mental functioning.
 And as we learn more and more about the brain,
 This gives us a lot of information and material to develop simulation models with, which give us more insight into the processes of our mind.
 AI does make most people think of science fiction, but it's also an essential part of computer science.
 Developing machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior falls under the umbrella of ai research.
 Some examples are management, planning, the ability to diagnose and answer questions from customers and recognition of handwriting, voice and face.
 These have become separate disciplines for finding solutions to problems in the real world.
 Nowadays, this system of artificial intelligence is widely used in economics, medicine, technology and military applications, such as in various software applications for PCs and video games.
 For each class, many field trips are planned, and often a teacher would take her or his students to places where a bus trip is not an option.
 Thanks to technological advances, virtual excursions are now possible, allowing students to view artefacts in a museum, to look inside an aquarium or to view beautiful works of art.
 Virtually sharing an excursion is also a fantastic way to look back on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, each year, students at Bennet school in North Carolina design a Website about their trip to the state capital, which is redesigned each year and whose earlier versions are preserved Online to serve as a scrapbook.
 Blogs can also help students to improve their writing, as often their grammar and spelling are poor at the beginning, but improve quickly as they have an audience.
 Because students are often the most critical audience, the Blogger strives to improve the writing and thereby avoid criticism.
 Blogging also forces students to learn more about the world around them.
 Blogging is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to extend their learning beyond the traditional school day.
 When used properly, Blogs can help students to develop analytical and critical thinking skills by actively engaging in the discussion on the Internet,
 The bilingual capital of Canada is the charming Ottawa, full of art galleries and museums that showcase Canada's past and its future.
 Further south you'll find Niagara falls, and in the North, the beautiful, untouched Muskoka.
 These things make Ontario typical of Canada in the eyes of outsiders.
 Further north, large areas are sparsely populated, and a part of these areas are even virtually uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that will surprise many is that there are more Afro-Americans in the United States than the total population of Canada.
 The East African Islands are located along the East Coast of Africa in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is by far the largest, and in terms of fauna, it is almost a separate continent.
 The majority of the smaller Islands are independent countries or are linked to France and are known as luxurious Beach resorts.
 The Arabs also took the Islamic faith with them, and it spread widely on the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India, which marked the beginning of European influence and colonization in the 15th century.
 The region borders the Atlantic Ocean to the south and west, and the Sahel to the north.
 Women are advised to say they are married, whether that is true or not.
 It also helps to put rings on the fingers.
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can lead to behavior that they may see as intimidating and that it is customary to be followed, to have one's arm taken, etc.
 Be clear when you reject a man and don't be afraid to stand up for yourself.
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded in the 10th century BC by Berber fishermen, who used it as a strategic port.
 The Portuguese destroyed the port and rebuilt it under the name Casa Branca, but after an earthquake in 1755, they left the city again.
 The Sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city and named it Daru l-Bayad, which the Spanish traders who settled here gave the name Casablanca.
 In Morocco, Casablanca is one of the least interesting places to shop.
 You can find a lot of traditional Moroccan goods around the old Medina, like tagines, pots, leather goods, water pipes and other knickknacks, but it's all aimed at tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of Congo, situated near Rwanda in the far East.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed when the Nyiragongo volcano erupted, and the city's main streets were covered in lava.
 Although Goma itself is relatively safe, you should check the state of affairs regarding the ongoing fighting in the province of North Kivu before visiting.
 In addition, the city is the base for climbing the Nyiragongo volcano and offers some of the cheapest Mountain Gorilla tracking trips in Africa.
 With a boda-boda, you can get around Goma. The normal price is about 500 Congolese Francs for the short ride.
 Timbuktu is relatively inaccessible and is nowadays used as a metaphor for exotic, faraway lands.
 Today, Timbuktu is a dilapidated city, although its reputation as a tourist destination and its airport make it a tourist attraction.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites.
 It was one of the main stops on the PBS exhibition, special wonders from the African world, by Henry Louis Gates.
 The city differs from the other cities in the country, because it has a more Arabic look than an African one.
 The Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa, and runs along the border with Mozambique in the east, the border with Zimbabwe in the North, and the Crocodile River in the South.
 The park is divided into 14 ecological zones, where various wildlife species are kept.
 As a major tourist attraction in South Africa, this park is the flagship of the South African National Parks.
 Like all South African national parks, there are daily conservation fees and entrance fees.
 It can also be useful to buy a Wildcard, which offers you entry to certain parts of the parks in South Africa or to all the national parks in South Africa.
 The whole of Hong Kong is named after the island of Hong Kong, and that is considered by many tourists to be the most important place.
 The sheer number of buildings that make up the skyline of Hong Kong has been compared to a glittering bar graph that is visible thanks to the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 For the best view of Hong Kong, leave the island and head to the waterfront of Kowloon on the other side.
 The vast majority of the people of Hong Kong live very close to each other on reclaimed land along the northern coast.
 This is where the British colonists settled, so if you're looking for evidence of the colonial past of the area, then you could start here.
 The Sundarbans are the largest mangrove forests in the world, and stretch from the coast 80 km into the Indian and Bengali interior.
 The Sundarbans are now officially on the UNESCO world heritage list, and the part within the Indian boundaries is called the Sundarbans National Park.
 The forests, however, are more than just mangrove swamps they also contain a few of the last mighty tracts of jungle that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 square kilometres, of which a third is peat and marsh.
 The Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary since 1966, and are now home to an estimated 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses leave from the station on the border of the districts, mostly between 6.30 and 7.30 a.m.
 It is wise to buy a ticket a few days earlier, because the local buses are often full.
 In most neighborhoods, small Japanese Coaster-Buses are used, which are comfortable and robust.
 Shared taxis can be used to travel quickly and comfortably to nearby places, such as Paro (150 ngultrum) and Punakha (200 ngultrum).
 The Oyapock bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that crosses the Oyapock River to connect the Brazilian city of Oiapoque and the French-Guyanese city of Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock.
 The two towers are 83 meters high, the building is 378 meters long and has two passages with a width of 3.50 meters.
 The bridge was opened to traffic in March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational in September 2017, and Brazilian customs posts are expected to be ready for use by then.
 The Guaraní was the most prominent indigenous group, living in what is now East-Central Paraguay,
 In the province of Chaco, other indigenous tribes lived, including the Guaycurú and Payaguá, who found their food by hunting, fishing, and gathering.
 Paraguay, formerly also called the great province of Indies, originated in the 16th century when Spanish colonists encountered the indigenous population.
 There followed a three-century period of Spanish colonization.
 Asuncion was founded in 1537 and since then, Paraguay has managed to retain much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is known for having one of the best polo teams and players in the world.
 In December, the largest tournament of the year takes place on the polo fields in Las Cañitas.
 During the winter, smaller tournaments and matches are also held here.
 Check out the Asociación Argentina de Polo for more information on tournaments and buying tickets for polo matches.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is roughly equivalent to the British pound.
 On the Islands, there is only one bank, namely in Stanley opposite the shop FIC West, where you can exchange money.
 In general, British pounds are accepted everywhere on the Islands, and in Stanley you can also often pay with credit cards and American dollars.
 On the remote Islands, you probably can't pay with a credit card, but you can probably pay with the British and American currencies.
 Exchange your money again before you leave the Islands, because Falkland Islands currency is very difficult to exchange.
 Montevideo is below the equator, so when it's summer there, it's winter in the northern hemisphere.
 Montevideo is situated in the subtropics. In the summer months, temperatures can reach higher than 30°C.
 The winter can be deceptively cold: the temperature rarely falls below zero, but the wind in combination with the humidity makes it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 The rainfall level remains about the same throughout the year, without any recognizable wet and dry periods.
 Many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, but wild animals are ultimately wild, and should not be fed or disturbed.
 In the park, keep at least 100 meters away from bears and wolves, and 25 meters away from all other wild animals.
 Elephants, buffalo, rhinoceros, bears and about all other big game can attack you, however tame they may seem.
 Every year, dozens of visitors get hurt because they don't keep a proper distance.
 In addition, bears and other wildlife are attracted to the scent of food, so avoid wearing or cooking scented foods and keep the camping area clean.
 The capital of Samoa is Apia, and the city with nearly 40,000 inhabitants is located on the island of Upolu.
 Around the year 1850, Apia was founded and it has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the port.
 With the exception of a British battleship, all the ships were sunk, and nearly 200 Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 In the war of independence, the highest leader, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III, was killed in a violent non-violent meeting in the town.
 There are many beaches, notably around the two harbours of Auckland, the most popular of which are located in three areas.
 The beaches of North Shore in the North Harbour district stretch from North to South along the Tasman Sea, from Long Bay to Devonport.
 These are nearly all sandy beaches where it is safe to swim and most have pohutukawa trees which provide shade.
 At Waitemata's harbour, in the luxury suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers, located in central Auckland, you'll find the Tamaki Drive beaches.
 These family beaches are sometimes crowded and have a good range of shops at the coast.
 Number one is the most important local beer, which is not a complex beer, but pleasant and refreshing.
 There are many French wines to be found, but New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps better suited to travel.
 The local drinking water can be safely drunk, but bottled water is also readily available if you don't trust the local water.
 A flat white is a strange concept for Australians, who are used to black coffee, cappuccino with very little coffee and tea without milk.
 The hot chocolate is of Belgian quality, and fruit juices are expensive, but great.
 There are dives all year round to the Reef, and injuries from these dives to the Reef are rare.
 Ask for expert advice and follow all signs and safety warnings.
 Kubuskwallen occur from October to April in the vicinity of beaches and river mouths north of Town of 1770.
 Sharks do come, but they rarely attack humans, and most of the sharks are afraid of humans and would actually swim away.
 The main habitat of saltwater crocodiles is in the river mouths north of Rockhampton, and they do not normally live in the ocean.
 Reserving in advance gives the traveller peace of mind, knowing that he or she will have a place to sleep when they arrive at their destination.
 Travel agencies often have deals with certain hotels, although you can usually book other accommodation, such as a camping site, through a travel agency.
 Travel agencies often offer packages with breakfast and transportation to and from the airport, and sometimes even with the flight and the hotel.
 They can also hold your reservation if you need a little bit longer to think about the offer or if you need to get documents for your destination, like a visa.
 If you have a request or a change, however, you must make it through the travel agency instead of the hotel.
 For some festivals, the majority of attendees at music festivals choose to camp on site and most festival-goers regard this as an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you'll need to be early to secure a camping spot near the music.
 And remember, even when the music on the main stages is over, there's still music playing on other parts of the festival grounds until late in the night.
 For families with young children, there are special camping areas at some festivals.
 Watch out for your hut as you cross the Baltic in winter, for the ice makes a tremendous noise if you are too close to it.
 Cruises to St . Petersburg include time to explore the city, and cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirements.
 Casinos are usually set up to take advantage of the time and money that guests spend.
 They have special offers on food, drink and entertainment to keep them in a good mood and to prevent them from leaving.
 Some locations offer free alcoholic beverages, but as people get drunk, it affects their judgment and all seasoned gamblers know that it's extremely important to stay sober.
 If you are going up high into the mountains or over mountain passes, you have to take into account that there may be snow or ice and the temperature can be extremely low.
 On icy and snowy roads there is little friction and it drives differently than on asphalt.
 During snowstorms, a lot of snow can fall in a very short period of time.
 The visibility can also be hampered by falling or blowing snow, or by condensation or ice on the vehicle's windows.
 On the other hand, ice and snow are normal in many countries, and traffic is not hampered by them.
 The largest tourist attraction in Africa is safari, which for many visitors is the highlight of their trip.
 The term safari in popular usage refers to a trip overland to view the beautiful African wildlife, especially on the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, often come close to cars and a standard outfit makes a good view possible.
 If you want to see lions, cheetahs and leopards, you need a telescope.
 A walking safari, also called a Bushwalk or a Loop-Safari, is a walking tour of several hours or days.
 The Paralympics are from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place at other locations in Japan.
 Tokyo will become the only Asian city to have hosted the Olympic Games twice. The first time was in 1964.
 If you had already booked a flight and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement was announced,
 The cancellation policy varies, but as of late March, most of the cancellation policies based on the Coronavirus are no longer valid until July 2020, when the Olympics were scheduled to take place.
 Looking decidedly rusty in the game against their southern sisters, South Africa however steadily improved as the tournament progressed.
 You can dry wet clothes by ironing them, many hotels have an iron and ironing board available, you can often borrow these items even if they are not in the room.
 If no iron is available, or if you do not wish to wear ironed socks, you can also use a hairdryer.
 Make sure the fabric is not too hot, or it may shrink or, in extreme cases, burn.
 You can purify water in a number of ways, some of which are effective at addressing specific risks.
 In some areas, it is sufficient to boil water for a minute, in other areas, water must be boiled for several minutes.
 Not every filter is effective, and in case of doubt, the best water to drink is from a sealed bottle of a trusted company.
 Travellers may encounter animal pests that are not found in their own country.
 Pests can spoil food, cause irritation, or in the worst case, cause allergic reactions, spread toxins, or transmit infections.
 Normally, infectious diseases themselves, or dangerous animals that injure or kill humans, are not considered pests.
 Tax-Free shopping refers to the ability to buy goods at locations that are exempt from tax and duty.
 Travellers going to countries with high excise duties can sometimes save a lot of money on products such as alcoholic beverages and tobacco.
 Point Marion and Fairmont are connected via the Buffalo to Pittsburgh highway, you often drive through abandoned back country, and that makes this route a big challenge.
 If you're not used to driving on country roads, keep your head up, as you'll encounter many steep hills, narrow streets, and sharp turns.
 The posted speed limits are remarkably lower than in earlier and adjacent areas,
 And surprisingly, you have a lot more reach here than in other parts of the route, like the Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastries are delicious and in Bavaria, the baked goods are quite rich and varied, just like the pastries of the southern neighbor, Austria.
 You see a lot of fruit cakes, apples all year round, and in the summer months, also cherries and plums.
 Many popular German pastries contain almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts, and taste great with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you'd like a few small but mighty cookies, try some that are called Berliner, Pfannkuchen, or Krapfen in the region.
 To make a curry, you need spicy and pungent ingredients, combined with vegetables or meat.
 Depending on the amount of liquid, a curry can be either dry or wet.
 In the interior of North India and also in Pakistan, yogurt is often used in curries, while in the South of India and some other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is used.
 Indonesian cuisine includes dishes from 17,000 islands and is a umbrella term for a variety of regional cuisines from all over the country.
 But without additional information, the term refers to food that originated in the central and eastern part of the main Java Island.
 The Indonesian kitchen is now available throughout the archipelago and offers several simple, spiced dishes. The most common Indonesian flavorings are nuts, peppers, sugar, and various aromatic herbs.
 Stirrups support the rider's feet and hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They provide the rider with more stability, but can also cause problems with safety, as the rider's feet can get caught in them.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but manages to keep his foot in the stirrup, he can be pulled along with the horse.
 The most common riding boots are firstly riding boots with a heel and a smooth, fairly narrow sole.
 Some saddles, and then especially English saddles, have safety stirrups, which allow a rider to release the stirrup if they fall from the horse.
 Cochamó Valley is the most popular climbing destination in Chile, and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with many different large granite walls and rocks.
 The mountain peaks offer a breathtaking view, and climbers from all over the world are constantly discovering new routes on the rock faces, which seem to have an endless potential.
 Winter sports where you go downhill, such as skiing and snowboarding, are very popular. You slide down a snow-covered slope on skis or a snowboard.
 Skiing is a popular recreational activity with many enthusiasts, who are sometimes referred to as ski bums,
 Skiing has been around for a very long time: there are cave paintings of skiers that date back to 5000 BC.
 The beginning of skiing dates at least to the seventeenth century, and in 1861 the first recreational ski resort in Australia was opened by Norwegians.
 Backpacking with skis: This activity is also known as off-piste skiing, ski touring, or ski hiking.
 It's not quite the same, but it's a lot like alpine skiing or mountain climbing, which is a lot of what people do on steep terrain.
 You can see the ski route as a hiking route.
 In good conditions, you can cover greater distances than by walking, but it is rare that you will be able to cover the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy rucksack.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries. Normally, travellers between different countries would have to apply for multiple visas and go through passport controls.
 The Schengen area functions almost as one country.
 As long as you are in this zone, you can usually cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 When you have a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a visa to each Schengen country separately, which saves time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of what constitutes an antique, and some tax authorities give the term antique to goods that are over 100 years old.
 The definition can vary by location, for example, in North America, the age limit is lower than in Europe.
 It is possible to register craft products as antiques, even though they are newer than similar mass-produced items.
 The keeping of reindeer is an important form of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture around the trade is also a very important part of their lives.
 Even though traditionally not all Sámi were involved in large-scale reindeer husbandry,
 Many Sámi today work in modern professions, and in Sápmi, the Sámi area, tourism is an important source of income.
 The word Gypsy is used mainly by non-Roma, but it is also often considered as a derogatory term.
 If there is a travel warning for the country you are going to, this can have consequences for your travel insurance or your cancellation insurance.
 You can also consult the advice of other governments, but their advice is only for their own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may be confronted with different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 Advice only includes a brief summary of the political situation in a single country.
 They often give a fleeting, general and extremely simplistic view in comparison to other, more detailed sources.
 A storm is the general term for any dangerous weather event that can lead to damage, severe social disruption, or loss of life.
 Extreme weather conditions can occur anywhere in the world. There are several types of extreme weather conditions, which vary based on geography, topography, and atmospheric conditions.
 The age where the events took place is commonly referred to as the High Middle Ages the period of European history in the 11th, 12th, and 13th centuries.
 Snowstorms, ice storms and dust storms are among other examples of regional and seasonal extreme weather phenomena.
 Travellers are strongly advised to be aware of the risks that severe weather conditions in their surroundings may bring, as these may also affect some travel plans.
 Anyone who wants to visit a war zone should be professionally trained.
 A search on the Internet for a course in hostile environments is likely to turn up the address of a local business.
 In a course, all the issues that have been discussed are normally dealt with in more detail, usually in combination with practical experience.
 A course normally lasts from two to five days and consists of role-playing, a lot of first aid and occasionally weapon training.
 There are many books and magazines with articles about surviving in the wilderness, but there are few publications about war zones.
 Travellers who have planned a gender-affirming surgery abroad should ensure they have the right documentation for their return journey.
 It varies quite a lot whether governments will issue passports without a gender marker, or to change a name or gender on documents.
 There is just as much difference in the willingness of foreign governments to recognise these documents.
 And searches at security controls have become much more extensive since 11 September 2001.
 Transgender individuals who have not yet undergone surgery can assume that they will not be exposed to any unintended exposure of their genitals.
 Muistromen are the recurring surge of waves that break on a reef or something similar and flow back onto the shore.
 Because of the underwater topography, the return flow is in some deeper parts, where a rapid current can occur.
 Most of the deaths occur as a result of exhaustion from trying to swim against the current, which could be impossible.
 When you've broken out of the strong current, it's easy to swim back.
 Try to focus on a spot where you're not going to be grabbed again, depending on your skills and whether you've been noticed, you can also wait for help.
 The shock of returning is worse than the culture shock, it lasts longer, and it can be more intense.
 Travellers who are easily adaptable to new cultures sometimes have difficulty in adapting to their own cultures.
 As you have lived abroad and then returned, you have adapted to the new culture and lost some of your own culture's habits.
 If you go back in time, when people went abroad,
 Most of the time, there is no expectation that patience and understanding is needed for returning travelers.
 For children, the pyramid show with light and sound is one of the most interesting activities in the neighborhood.
 You see the pyramids in the dark and you see them in silence before the show begins.
 The sound of vendors and tourists is always audible here,
 The Sphinx forms the background and is the narrator of a long story.
 The scenes appear as projections on the pyramids, and the rest of the pyramids are illuminated.
 The South Shetland Islands were discovered in 1819 and have been claimed by several countries since then, with the most bases, sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago is located 120 km to the north of the peninsula. The largest island is King George Island, with the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Others are Livingston Island, and Deception, where you'll find the full-flowing crater of an active volcano that serves as a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth is located on the southern side of the peninsula, near the Bellingshausen Sea.
 Here the mountains of the peninsula give way to the plateau, and then reappear to form the 360 km long Mount Ellsworth range, which is crossed by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part, also known as the Sentinel Range, includes the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif.
 A satellite phone may be your only option in remote locations where there is no mobile phone reception.
 A satellite phone is not really a replacement for a mobile phone, since you have to stand outside with a clear view of the satellite in order to make a phone call.
 This service is often used by the shipping industry, including pleasure craft, and for expeditions where there is a need for external data and communication.
 Your local telephone provider can give you more information about how to connect to this service.
 It is becoming increasingly popular for people who are planning a gap year to travel and learn.
 Especially school leavers make use of this to take a gap year before entering university without any negative consequences for their education.
 Often, a registration for a course abroad during a gap year can increase your chances of getting into higher education in your own country.
 Normally, there is a fee for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is a fantastic destination for sailing. The land of a thousand lakes also has thousands of islands, in the lakes and in the archipelagoes off the coast.
 A yacht is not necessary for the archipelagoes or lakes.
 The archipelagoes off the coast and the largest lakes are indeed large enough for any boat, but with smaller boats or even a kayak, you get a totally different experience.
 In Finland, so many people sail in their spare time that the ratio of boats to people is one in seven or eight.
 The figure is equal to the figure of Norway, Sweden and New Zealand. It is also quite unique.
 For most Baltic cruises, a long stay in St Petersburg, Russia, is included.
 You can spend several full days in the historic town and stay overnight on the ship.
 Since 2009, you do not need a separate visa if you are only going ashore during a boat excursion.
 Some cruises include a visit to the German capital Berlin, but as you can see on the map, Berlin is not close to the sea.
 Air travel can be daunting for people of all backgrounds and ages, especially if they've never flown before or if they've had a traumatic experience.
 It's not something to be ashamed of, it's not different from a lot of other fears that other people have.
 If you know how airplanes work, it can help to take away some of the fear that comes from not knowing or from not having control over the airplane.
 Courier companies get a hefty fee to deliver items quickly. For business documents, shopping or spare parts for a necessary repair, time often plays a very important role.
 Larger companies could use their own planes for certain routes, but for other routes it was more difficult.
 If they're shipping things via air, it can take days for some routes to get them out of the airport and through customs.
 Only as checked baggage could it be processed more quickly, according to the rules of the airline,
 The most obvious way to fly first or business class is by paying for this privilege with a bag of money.
 But this is not cheap: the rule of thumb is that you pay about four times economy for business, and about eleven times for first.
 It is usually not worthwhile to look for business or first class discounts on direct flights from A to B.
 Airlines know all too well that there is a group of fliers who are prepared to pay a lot of money to get somewhere quickly and comfortably, and the airlines charge them accordingly.
 Chişinău is the capital of Moldova, and here the Romanian language is spoken, but also the Russian language is spoken a lot.
 As a multi-ethnic Republic, Moldova was plagued by an ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the creation of the self-proclaimed Transnistrian Republic in the east of Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by the members of the UN.
 There are new economic ties between these two parts of Moldova, despite the fact that the political negotiations have failed.
 Orthodox Christianity is the main religion in Moldova.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of around 3.7 million, the largest port after Istanbul, and a major transportation hub.
 The once ancient city of Izmir is now a modern, developed and busy commercial center on a Bay, surrounded by mountains.
 The wide boulevards, the glass buildings and the modern shopping centers that are covered with red tiles, the 18th-century markets, the old mosques and churches,
 In the village of Haldarsvik, you'll enjoy views of the nearby Eysturoy Island, as well as a special church with eight corners.
 On a number of graves at the church are interesting marble sculptures of doves.
 If you have half an hour, you should certainly take a look around this village.
 In the North, you'll find the well-connected, romantic and fascinating town of Sintra, which became famous among foreigners after Lord Byron praised its beautiful monuments.
 Scotturb-bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra, with a stop at Cabo da Roca.
 Go also to the North and visit the beautiful Sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima, where internationally known Marian apparitions took place.
 Remember, you're actually just visiting a mass grave, but also a place that holds a lot of meaning for a large part of the world's population.
 Many men and women who have survived their time here are still alive and many of them have loved ones who were murdered or worked themselves to death, both Jews and non-Jews.
 Show all due respect, solemnity and dignity during your visit. Do not trivialise the Holocaust or Nazism.
 Do not damage the site by marking or graffiti on the buildings.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish, with about half of the inhabitants preferring Catalan, the large majority can understand it, and almost everyone speaks Spanish.
 The majority of the signs, however, are in Catalan, as that is the first official language, according to the law.
 In public transport and other facilities, however, Spanish is spoken a great deal.
 Ordinary announcements in the metro are only in Catalan, but unplanned interruptions are made by an automated system in several languages, including French, Arabic, Spanish, English and also in Japanese.
 The people of Paris are known to be egotistical, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is usually just a misguided stereotype, it can't hurt to put your best foot forward in Paris and to behave as someone who is bien élevé.
 The hard exterior of the Parisians disappears quickly when you show that you are familiar with their way of doing things.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is heavily forested and this heavily forested area consists mainly of beech, spruce and fir, and includes a combination of alpine and Mediterranean flora.
 There are a variety of different plant communities, due to the varying microclimates, soil types and varying elevation.
 This area is also the habitat of a very wide range of animal and bird species.
 There are rare animals such as the European Brown bear, the wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the wild cat and the capercaillie, as well as a variety of more common species.
 When women visit a monastery, they are required to wear a skirt to the knee and their shoulders must be covered.
 Most of the time you will get a towel as a woman when you arrive unprepared at a monastery, but should you bring your own exquisitely colored one,
 On the other hand, men are required to wear trousers to at least the knee.
 You can also borrow from the stock at the entrance, but these clothes are not washed after each use, so you might not feel comfortable in them.
 Like many other Mediterranean regions, Mallorcan cuisine is based on bread, vegetables and meat,
 A simple and popular evening meal, especially during the summer months, is Pa amb Oli: bread with olive oil, tomatoes and whatever is available to add flavor, such as cheese, tuna, etc.
 Independent nouns, like Sie, which means you, always have a capital letter at the beginning, even if they are in the middle of a sentence.
 In this way you make a distinct difference between a number of verbs and nouns.
 Reading, however, is probably easier, and writing is more complicated, because you have to figure out whether a verb or an adjective is used as a noun.
 Most Italian words are written exactly as they are pronounced, so the pronunciation generally poses little problem.
 You have to pay the most attention to the c and the g. The pronunciation of those depends on the vowel that follows.
 You also have to distinguish between the r and the rr,
 The Persian language has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 Reading this introduction to the grammar will teach you a lot about the grammar of Persian and will help you to understand sentences.
 It is quite logical that if you know a Romance language, it is easier for you to learn Portuguese.
 But people who speak a little bit of Spanish can quickly conclude that Portuguese sounds a lot like it,
 Pre-Modern observatories are nowadays relegated to museums or educational sites.
 Light pollution was not as big of a problem then as it is now, so they were often built in cities or on campuses, better accessible than they are today.
 Most of the modern research telescopes are huge facilities built in remote areas with favourable atmospheric conditions.
 Hanami is the act of viewing cherry blossom and this has been a part of Japanese culture since the eighth century.
 In China, the favorite flowers were peach blossoms, and that's where the concept came from.
 The first Cherry Blossom festivals of Japan were organized by the Emperor and were only for him and other aristocrats at the Imperial court.
 Plants look best in a natural environment, which makes it hard to resist the temptation to remove even just one species.
 When you collect samples during a visit to an established garden, you are immediately and without discussion denied access to the garden.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to be, very easy to navigate, and almost everything is available once you arrive.
 But if you're in the high tropics, but a few degrees north of the equator, you'll experience both heat and powerful sunlight.
 There are also some buses going in a northerly direction to Hebron, the supposed burial place of the Biblical patriarchs Isaac, Jacob, Abraham, and their wives.
 Look carefully to see if the bus you are taking really goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good holiday destination.
 You can visit castles in the Loire Valley or the Rhine Valley, book a cruise to the interesting cities along the Danube, or take a boat trip along the Erie Canal.
 They also give popular walking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays of the Christian religion, celebrating the birth of Jesus.
 People who do not believe in Christianity and Non-Christians around the world have also adopted many traditions that are associated with the holiday.
 There is a tradition of staying up all night on Easter Eve until you can see the sunrise.
 And of course, there are Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it could just as easily be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 In traditional churches, a Easter Vigil is often held on the Saturday evening of the Easter weekend,
 All the animals that originally came to the Islands arrived by swimming, flying, or drifting.
 Because of the long distance from the continent, it was not possible for mammals to make the journey, and so the Galapagos tortoise became the most common grazing mammal on the Galapagos Islands.
 Since man first set foot on the Galapagos, there have been all sorts of introduced mammals, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats and dogs.
 During the winter, the Arctic and Antarctic regions experience the polar night, which means that the sun does not actually rise.
 There is a good chance you will be able to see the northern lights, as the sky will be mostly dark day and night.
 The areas are sparsely populated and therefore light pollution is not a problem, which means you can also enjoy the view of the stars.
 The Japanese work environment is structured and formal in nature, unlike the Western world.
 Pak's are standard work clothes and colleagues are addressed by their last name or job title.
 Teamwork is of crucial importance. The focus is on group performance instead of on the individual.
 Employees often need to seek approval from their managers before they can make a decision, and are expected to follow the instructions of their managers without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.26325186111595633, 'precisions': [0.6135937568121376, 0.3453591790193843, 0.21761583703916224, 0.14215366062006934], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9251695488646879, 'length_ratio': 0.9278346345212573, 'translation_length': 22937, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 54.02439148601078, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.841899731413649, 'scores': [0.7067869305610657, 0.7436317205429077, 0.9166049361228943, 0.7860924005508423, 0.8481205105781555, 0.8144325017929077, 0.87274569272995, 0.8703799247741699, 0.8656876087188721, 0.9435217976570129, 0.9100958704948425, 0.8562793731689453, 0.9023167490959167, 0.8587673902511597, 0.8381931185722351, 0.8610182404518127, 0.9005078673362732, 0.8879220485687256, 0.8864516615867615, 0.8726340532302856, 0.9284126162528992, 0.9233159422874451, 0.8099340200424194, 0.853324830532074, 0.8584239482879639, 0.9122228026390076, 0.837191641330719, 0.8531025648117065, 0.8839662075042725, 0.9429730176925659, 0.7667666673660278, 0.6851272583007812, 0.7697375416755676, 0.9012532830238342, 0.9121823906898499, 0.9017823934555054, 0.6963855028152466, 0.8867156505584717, 0.879213809967041, 0.9193708300590515, 0.8317795395851135, 0.8914839625358582, 0.9118947386741638, 0.9256858825683594, 0.8841175436973572, 0.62123042345047, 0.8487720489501953, 0.9122668504714966, 0.8967545628547668, 0.8935388326644897, 0.930389940738678, 0.8646072149276733, 0.8798477053642273, 0.8772838711738586, 0.8870645761489868, 0.8581785559654236, 0.8120107054710388, 0.8663267493247986, 0.8985385894775391, 0.9084785580635071, 0.796897828578949, 0.9133965969085693, 0.7609208226203918, 0.8029354810714722, 0.8667463064193726, 0.8963238596916199, 0.7313425540924072, 0.8496453762054443, 0.8701043725013733, 0.8629847168922424, 0.692240297794342, 0.8842385411262512, 0.7490076422691345, 0.8484966158866882, 0.8284597992897034, 0.7007238864898682, 0.8621373772621155, 0.8401086330413818, 0.9186617732048035, 0.8787504434585571, 0.9352522492408752, 0.8756797313690186, 0.8526390790939331, 0.7745333313941956, 0.8607431650161743, 0.7669045329093933, 0.813546359539032, 0.8707330226898193, 0.9111525416374207, 0.8579571843147278, 0.8460235595703125, 0.8956142067909241, 0.8168184161186218, 0.8863738775253296, 0.6022603511810303, 0.9295628070831299, 0.905467689037323, 0.6218519806861877, 0.8589774370193481, 0.8602676391601562, 0.9155575633049011, 0.7089258432388306, 0.9185742139816284, 0.9284701347351074, 0.9113966822624207, 0.8829522728919983, 0.8631913065910339, 0.8636118173599243, 0.829799473285675, 0.8426454663276672, 0.8652662038803101, 0.9258678555488586, 0.9468883872032166, 0.9106543660163879, 0.6530999541282654, 0.848676860332489, 0.8927022814750671, 0.8919307589530945, 0.956095278263092, 0.7744196653366089, 0.8464985489845276, 0.7446022629737854, 0.8976025581359863, 0.9122220277786255, 0.8710089325904846, 0.8994926810264587, 0.9107559323310852, 0.8970207571983337, 0.8743853569030762, 0.8596397042274475, 0.8871029019355774, 0.8510524034500122, 0.9030680656433105, 0.8729798197746277, 0.810576856136322, 0.8220763802528381, 0.5843174457550049, 0.9047141671180725, 0.9637429118156433, 0.7677133679389954, 0.91471928358078, 0.7435429096221924, 0.9081224799156189, 0.8624269366264343, 0.7643615007400513, 0.869593620300293, 0.8425391316413879, 0.9214516282081604, 0.8441142439842224, 0.8992108702659607, 0.8938089609146118, 0.639976441860199, 0.6118329167366028, 0.8550282120704651, 0.7980287075042725, 0.8616579174995422, 0.8309485912322998, 0.8093512654304504, 0.8648415803909302, 0.8936086893081665, 0.9077979922294617, 0.7161905169487, 0.5978316068649292, 0.8628356456756592, 0.8866896629333496, 0.839858889579773, 0.6831163167953491, 0.8689880967140198, 0.8448840975761414, 0.7774345278739929, 0.8893916010856628, 0.7910259366035461, 0.9416577219963074, 0.8699871897697449, 0.8509452939033508, 0.8079710006713867, 0.7547338008880615, 0.9430957436561584, 0.7696440815925598, 0.9346687197685242, 0.8494014739990234, 0.9204240441322327, 0.8627192974090576, 0.8850926756858826, 0.8815189599990845, 0.8758213520050049, 0.9549029469490051, 0.8779509663581848, 0.8066443800926208, 0.8088763356208801, 0.8957250714302063, 0.9210346341133118, 0.8587957620620728, 0.7773703932762146, 0.9111307263374329, 0.9255902767181396, 0.8064748048782349, 0.7619051337242126, 0.8922114968299866, 0.8328883051872253, 0.8557503819465637, 0.8624982833862305, 0.7566699385643005, 0.7298933863639832, 0.8844185471534729, 0.8524978756904602, 0.8506534695625305, 0.8357171416282654, 0.931327223777771, 0.42633959650993347, 0.8573071956634521, 0.9121918082237244, 0.904318630695343, 0.9043181538581848, 0.9191445708274841, 0.8147245049476624, 0.9312161803245544, 0.8552660346031189, 0.8992525339126587, 0.8888097405433655, 0.9297787547111511, 0.9112878441810608, 0.9012077450752258, 0.8639870285987854, 0.8949669003486633, 0.8573905825614929, 0.9213464260101318, 0.8539085388183594, 0.8812806010246277, 0.8358420729637146, 0.7581759095191956, 0.8827542662620544, 0.7064096331596375, 0.8600943684577942, 0.537543535232544, 0.9117890000343323, 0.897020161151886, 0.860257089138031, 0.9231910705566406, 0.8935351967811584, 0.8630161881446838, 0.8474732041358948, 0.7580474019050598, 0.8491266369819641, 0.8444963097572327, 0.9002591967582703, 0.8512770533561707, 0.5258535742759705, 0.7734668850898743, 0.9218403100967407, 0.896706759929657, 0.9030275940895081, 0.8479917645454407, 0.9277530312538147, 0.9081425666809082, 0.8748618960380554, 0.9016016125679016, 0.6181487441062927, 0.8538981080055237, 0.8672680854797363, 0.8878621459007263, 0.8060281276702881, 0.7961977124214172, 0.8295007348060608, 0.9145575761795044, 0.7926048636436462, 0.8111116290092468, 0.8598983883857727, 0.94264155626297, 0.9029635787010193, 0.8562129139900208, 0.8262368440628052, 0.7916758060455322, 0.8656972646713257, 0.8559390902519226, 0.7976283431053162, 0.8119813799858093, 0.9368683099746704, 0.8398688435554504, 0.9268153309822083, 0.8763660192489624, 0.8885301947593689, 0.9111351370811462, 0.9112663865089417, 0.9338002800941467, 0.9354396462440491, 0.908571183681488, 0.8037145137786865, 0.930015504360199, 0.8763793110847473, 0.8602763414382935, 0.7820761799812317, 0.8932949900627136, 0.8962534666061401, 0.8315441012382507, 0.8888786435127258, 0.8656895160675049, 0.8557661175727844, 0.711378276348114, 0.844943106174469, 0.8908116221427917, 0.9014843106269836, 0.8944107294082642, 0.8763025999069214, 0.850453794002533, 0.39566126465797424, 0.7587180733680725, 0.847707986831665, 0.8865346312522888, 0.8421452641487122, 0.8969473838806152, 0.925859808921814, 0.8956573605537415, 0.6738823056221008, 0.9141847491264343, 0.8709014058113098, 0.8766286969184875, 0.873418390750885, 0.4996824562549591, 0.9160711765289307, 0.795011043548584, 0.6176724433898926, 0.90184086561203, 0.8476694226264954, 0.9066426157951355, 0.828203558921814, 0.851271390914917, 0.8685093522071838, 0.9161266088485718, 0.9359912276268005, 0.8914231657981873, 0.8489809632301331, 0.9070751667022705, 0.872256338596344, 0.9326233863830566, 0.8804652094841003, 0.9032729268074036, 0.8694486021995544, 0.8705600500106812, 0.8828446269035339, 0.607204258441925, 0.9211714863777161, 0.6984174251556396, 0.8677524924278259, 0.8571648001670837, 0.8307592272758484, 0.8812972903251648, 0.8874297142028809, 0.8191227316856384, 0.828123927116394, 0.8856999278068542, 0.8263133764266968, 0.7285691499710083, 0.9411239624023438, 0.8581556677818298, 0.8945075869560242, 0.8509303331375122, 0.8810725808143616, 0.8431138396263123, 0.7911221385002136, 0.8450248837471008, 0.9025514721870422, 0.9175272583961487, 0.8247477412223816, 0.914492666721344, 0.7334941029548645, 0.8394062519073486, 0.7518237829208374, 0.686202883720398, 0.7373247742652893, 0.8308566808700562, 0.6242995858192444, 0.6322324275970459, 0.7379836440086365, 0.9124440550804138, 0.9294931888580322, 0.9255996942520142, 0.8083569407463074, 0.8747135996818542, 0.7831777930259705, 0.9067743420600891, 0.721432626247406, 0.7839022278785706, 0.6959946751594543, 0.6564344763755798, 0.8879604339599609, 0.7866498231887817, 0.8357513546943665, 0.8849360346794128, 0.8952658772468567, 0.8922317028045654, 0.8700686097145081, 0.8065431714057922, 0.9555739760398865, 0.8988862633705139, 0.8800367116928101, 0.690970778465271, 0.9488715529441833, 0.6746571660041809, 0.8614280223846436, 0.8912920355796814, 0.8622438907623291, 0.709177553653717, 0.8480553030967712, 0.844585120677948, 0.8022075295448303, 0.881833016872406, 0.8296775221824646, 0.8920994400978088, 0.8583503365516663, 0.8965856432914734, 0.854702889919281, 0.8376645445823669, 0.8996974229812622, 0.8767439723014832, 0.8451002240180969, 0.8731375336647034, 0.7981948256492615, 0.9100465178489685, 0.945415735244751, 0.9344626665115356, 0.8518052101135254, 0.8378784656524658, 0.8414343595504761, 0.7729334235191345, 0.8106167316436768, 0.6504577398300171, 0.8593034148216248, 0.9050737619400024, 0.9158576726913452, 0.8795261979103088, 0.7498290538787842, 0.8080812096595764, 0.8543276786804199, 0.7077659964561462, 0.8236138224601746, 0.8604878783226013, 0.892739474773407, 0.8678666949272156, 0.8760409951210022, 0.8773837089538574, 0.8882327079772949, 0.7084389328956604, 0.6499411463737488, 0.8440703749656677, 0.8346993327140808, 0.8325232267379761, 0.861335813999176, 0.9064003229141235, 0.7464210987091064, 0.7366133332252502, 0.734226644039154, 0.915916383266449, 0.7335725426673889, 0.8705072999000549, 0.8056230545043945, 0.8035153150558472, 0.8513030409812927, 0.7640531659126282, 0.8743032813072205, 0.9069857001304626, 0.8643885850906372, 0.7211249470710754, 0.8816201686859131, 0.8538385629653931, 0.7902863025665283, 0.9261066317558289, 0.8318877816200256, 0.41006383299827576, 0.836195707321167, 0.8623599410057068, 0.6601271033287048, 0.804616391658783, 0.821446418762207, 0.7943392395973206, 0.8712798953056335, 0.8194050788879395, 0.8185729384422302, 0.9126139879226685, 0.8972233533859253, 0.8590789437294006, 0.8839451670646667, 0.9119470715522766, 0.8661931753158569, 0.9003065824508667, 0.8604558110237122, 0.8803316950798035, 0.8209120631217957, 0.8905129432678223, 0.8621434569358826, 0.8639509677886963, 0.8167547583580017, 0.8961235880851746, 0.8941519856452942, 0.8862932920455933, 0.7357538938522339, 0.6501278281211853, 0.8400078415870667, 0.8626673817634583, 0.5956290364265442, 0.9435083270072937, 0.9186171889305115, 0.8006701469421387, 0.777130663394928, 0.8050655722618103, 0.8223941326141357, 0.8700830936431885, 0.7181212306022644, 0.8659260869026184, 0.8867199420928955, 0.7896901965141296, 0.7290896773338318, 0.8549836277961731, 0.7691460251808167, 0.8967297077178955, 0.8920491933822632, 0.8111595511436462, 0.8657433986663818, 0.8441505432128906, 0.8419846892356873, 0.8621518611907959, 0.8768932223320007, 0.7959816455841064, 0.8804420828819275, 0.8973008990287781, 0.8824666738510132, 0.9421315789222717, 0.7811904549598694, 0.5685134530067444, 0.8553364872932434, 0.6872771382331848, 0.8788701891899109, 0.8603402376174927, 0.825741171836853, 0.8864884376525879, 0.8068945407867432, 0.702177107334137, 0.8436194658279419, 0.8610734343528748, 0.8101116418838501, 0.8826789259910583, 0.8537554740905762, 0.8560640811920166, 0.6390942931175232, 0.8014330267906189, 0.6550458669662476, 0.8395355343818665, 0.8343072533607483, 0.6912714838981628, 0.8824179768562317, 0.8221998810768127, 0.824493944644928, 0.8252853751182556, 0.8440647721290588, 0.9140980839729309, 0.7565298080444336, 0.7619808316230774, 0.7456398606300354, 0.8034664988517761, 0.6431748270988464, 0.8361355662345886, 0.8831782937049866, 0.5253008008003235, 0.8737314343452454, 0.600409746170044, 0.8604763150215149, 0.8725864887237549, 0.666909396648407, 0.6728693842887878, 0.8101087808609009, 0.9120659232139587, 0.8929735422134399, 0.8077419996261597, 0.8633415102958679, 0.9267069101333618, 0.8657108545303345, 0.8400202393531799, 0.8764730095863342, 0.7621158957481384, 0.8359979391098022, 0.8868266940116882, 0.9593563675880432, 0.7418686747550964, 0.8453314900398254, 0.7972367405891418, 0.8694888949394226, 0.7939069867134094, 0.9282216429710388, 0.9409335255622864, 0.9047191739082336, 0.9133816361427307, 0.8868758082389832, 0.7251175045967102, 0.9213902950286865, 0.8943023681640625, 0.8162292838096619, 0.859584391117096, 0.785887598991394, 0.8490982055664062, 0.919260561466217, 0.8998799920082092, 0.7807579636573792, 0.867901623249054, 0.8696361184120178, 0.851672351360321, 0.7162914276123047, 0.8343061804771423, 0.7922233939170837, 0.8805502653121948, 0.8307403326034546, 0.9108061194419861, 0.8780997395515442, 0.4115265905857086, 0.8592352271080017, 0.8734980821609497, 0.8784968256950378, 0.8803253173828125, 0.8713608384132385, 0.5692323446273804, 0.8723065257072449, 0.8789767622947693, 0.7588497996330261, 0.7615376114845276, 0.8640726208686829, 0.850770115852356, 0.8900845646858215, 0.9369069933891296, 0.8997840285301208, 0.8778391480445862, 0.8972548246383667, 0.8593392968177795, 0.8856520056724548, 0.7652741074562073, 0.8730444312095642, 0.9136164784431458, 0.9085840582847595, 0.918357789516449, 0.9031465649604797, 0.6324376463890076, 0.8973013162612915, 0.8976994156837463, 0.9254201650619507, 0.7577430605888367, 0.8657569289207458, 0.6613461375236511, 0.8144595623016357, 0.8285682797431946, 0.9034802317619324, 0.8330891132354736, 0.872496485710144, 0.8893835544586182, 0.8776556849479675, 0.7862417101860046, 0.7769807577133179, 0.8716331124305725, 0.9260127544403076, 0.8354153037071228, 0.9060213565826416, 0.675746738910675, 0.8579527139663696, 0.6707851886749268, 0.9245639443397522, 0.9083423018455505, 0.9179893732070923, 0.9077842235565186, 0.8789053559303284, 0.8505522012710571, 0.9179021716117859, 0.9247954487800598, 0.9048977494239807, 0.9000576138496399, 0.8990511894226074, 0.40023693442344666, 0.8869721293449402, 0.9173244833946228, 0.8975239396095276, 0.6713912487030029, 0.9032979607582092, 0.8079491853713989, 0.8588586449623108, 0.8808237314224243, 0.921055257320404, 0.8751432299613953, 0.8476612567901611, 0.8365690112113953, 0.8897473216056824, 0.8864791989326477, 0.8527001142501831, 0.8771007061004639, 0.782850444316864, 0.9483442902565002, 0.7853936553001404, 0.8946813941001892, 0.8752755522727966, 0.8006044030189514, 0.9338262677192688, 0.8849826455116272, 0.9195576310157776, 0.8556063771247864, 0.9048984050750732, 0.8516199588775635, 0.9156957268714905, 0.8850666880607605, 0.7782472372055054, 0.4914766848087311, 0.8011947870254517, 0.6916175484657288, 0.8598952293395996, 0.8756734132766724, 0.8807512521743774, 0.9272715449333191, 0.8433120846748352, 0.9207016229629517, 0.855912446975708, 0.861552357673645, 0.8955618143081665, 0.8663334250450134, 0.8695611357688904, 0.882169783115387, 0.814335286617279, 0.8368903994560242, 0.8893818259239197, 0.8920935988426208, 0.8225833177566528, 0.8794440627098083, 0.9246520400047302, 0.8882676959037781, 0.8401218056678772, 0.8333254456520081, 0.9204088449478149, 0.7697885036468506, 0.8756663203239441, 0.8810077905654907, 0.8526249527931213, 0.8993286490440369, 0.8572834134101868, 0.8940656781196594, 0.7124016880989075, 0.8793736100196838, 0.7474382519721985, 0.818775475025177, 0.8504934310913086, 0.8579930663108826, 0.7258204817771912, 0.8953363299369812, 0.7241765856742859, 0.8903560638427734, 0.8408533930778503, 0.8372009992599487, 0.9221102595329285, 0.9569490551948547, 0.928274929523468, 0.792735755443573, 0.9119545817375183, 0.8033416867256165, 0.8525595664978027, 0.8647769093513489, 0.7596948742866516, 0.8421737551689148, 0.8592252135276794, 0.9266462922096252, 0.9357362389564514, 0.8663010597229004, 0.8951864838600159, 0.8689792156219482, 0.8221419453620911, 0.7782776951789856, 0.841139018535614, 0.8899458646774292, 0.9392925500869751, 0.7576913237571716, 0.8960509896278381, 0.7979626059532166, 0.8557215332984924, 0.8650911450386047, 0.9137724041938782, 0.8173745274543762, 0.8284766674041748, 0.8100088238716125, 0.8891934752464294, 0.858896791934967, 0.7535552978515625, 0.902056872844696, 0.7926248908042908, 0.8479837775230408, 0.6020427942276001, 0.8931283950805664, 0.9042865633964539, 0.9171993136405945, 0.9146548509597778, 0.8470147252082825, 0.8567164540290833, 0.8044801950454712, 0.9014897346496582, 0.9113008975982666, 0.8452156186103821, 0.9413653016090393, 0.7187395095825195, 0.8922523856163025, 0.7389836311340332, 0.8756373524665833, 0.8705013394355774, 0.8244177103042603, 0.8319420218467712, 0.8210249543190002, 0.9211371541023254, 0.840050220489502, 0.9099054336547852, 0.9177713990211487, 0.8173128962516785, 0.7501007914543152, 0.8173115849494934, 0.9063898324966431, 0.8999698758125305, 0.8486893773078918, 0.8830797076225281, 0.3882189095020294, 0.8698254227638245, 0.8694896101951599, 0.8469942212104797, 0.8755601644515991, 0.8683968782424927, 0.8090969324111938, 0.8657326102256775, 0.9408891201019287, 0.9078695178031921, 0.8577529788017273, 0.8923470377922058, 0.7993354797363281, 0.8745496869087219, 0.6968676447868347, 0.7970731854438782, 0.867392361164093, 0.7426230907440186, 0.8883510231971741, 0.839225709438324, 0.8127781748771667, 0.9022272825241089, 0.8828222751617432, 0.8939185738563538, 0.8603430390357971, 0.827131986618042, 0.8552404642105103, 0.885419487953186, 0.7298014760017395, 0.7758952975273132, 0.7259796857833862, 0.8984846472740173, 0.8177589774131775, 0.862054169178009, 0.7771568894386292, 0.8956343531608582, 0.8937787413597107, 0.9169458746910095, 0.7175373435020447, 0.7955419421195984, 0.8044074773788452, 0.8917835354804993, 0.8764612078666687, 0.9355421662330627, 0.8936245441436768, 0.8859096169471741, 0.9027498364448547, 0.87306147813797, 0.8411003351211548, 0.6985955834388733, 0.899832010269165, 0.7606547474861145, 0.8479510545730591, 0.8696570992469788, 0.923527717590332, 0.8829782605171204, 0.8495306372642517, 0.8988980650901794, 0.9139931797981262, 0.32622942328453064, 0.9170264601707458, 0.8818232417106628, 0.8949834704399109, 0.8063209056854248, 0.8680271506309509, 0.9124153256416321, 0.8948447704315186, 0.8826109170913696, 0.7888913750648499, 0.8472614884376526, 0.8538286089897156, 0.6789785027503967, 0.7403818964958191, 0.8483620285987854, 0.8916099667549133, 0.753593385219574, 0.7981168627738953, 0.8310403227806091, 0.8566815853118896, 0.878718376159668, 0.46249571442604065, 0.7729661464691162, 0.9042779207229614, 0.9065137505531311, 0.6639308929443359, 0.9075034856796265, 0.8219011425971985, 0.9022249579429626, 0.926114022731781, 0.8422377705574036, 0.8691186308860779, 0.855434000492096, 0.8644009828567505, 0.9288590550422668, 0.9024901986122131, 0.8556872010231018, 0.9460433125495911, 0.8938823342323303, 0.8477552533149719, 0.8814623951911926, 0.916379451751709, 0.8709860444068909, 0.8417683243751526, 0.8761914372444153, 0.7676839232444763, 0.758903443813324, 0.8943060040473938, 0.8345094919204712, 0.8813173174858093, 0.8395856618881226, 0.9219918847084045, 0.8612222075462341, 0.8532934784889221, 0.8349413275718689, 0.8667140603065491, 0.87934410572052, 0.6690769791603088, 0.7860621809959412, 0.7075944542884827, 0.8664849400520325, 0.8639646172523499, 0.8662106394767761, 0.8418040871620178, 0.9099304676055908, 0.8944193720817566, 0.9571666121482849, 0.9301477074623108, 0.8589188456535339, 0.7614933848381042, 0.7725717425346375, 0.857273280620575, 0.7883561253547668, 0.8244032263755798, 0.913188636302948, 0.8637649416923523, 0.8212850093841553, 0.8805533647537231, 0.875572919845581, 0.8781685829162598, 0.9123625159263611, 0.868208110332489, 0.8866305947303772, 0.8753001689910889, 0.9244754910469055, 0.7320042848587036, 0.7555690407752991, 0.8743977546691895, 0.8857979774475098, 0.9371174573898315, 0.8419153690338135, 0.8782998919487, 0.6180636286735535, 0.8030660152435303, 0.7489256262779236, 0.8154705166816711, 0.892829418182373, 0.7625210285186768, 0.7795761227607727, 0.8435336947441101, 0.8968595266342163, 0.7960851192474365, 0.5587641596794128, 0.9540656805038452, 0.816494882106781, 0.8387038111686707, 0.6911097764968872, 0.8657008409500122, 0.8432450294494629, 0.9322976469993591, 0.877011775970459, 0.8911148309707642, 0.8586027026176453, 0.8550201058387756, 0.7540479898452759, 0.9251790642738342, 0.786579966545105, 0.8993452191352844, 0.8941808342933655, 0.8915750980377197, 0.906816840171814, 0.8691626787185669, 0.92319256067276, 0.8633750677108765, 0.8243382573127747, 0.9057891964912415, 0.6956904530525208, 0.9057103991508484, 0.8388834595680237, 0.9090356826782227, 0.8738404512405396, 0.7253875136375427, 0.9097955822944641, 0.8742501735687256, 0.7888155579566956, 0.818911612033844, 0.8795709609985352]}